Protecting Your Privacy
At QSKINZ, we are 100% committed to protecting the privacy and security of our customers and site visitors (we mean you). We are customers, just as you are – so we totally appreciate and respect how important privacy is for you. We will share as much information, as we can, including links how to manage for example your cookies, or to set your browser to block those. We believe that this section will not only provide you with full information how we control your data, but also will help you to better manage and protect your privacy online. If you have any questions about how we Protect Your Privacy, drop us a line at privacy@easyskinz.com
For all our services, the data controller - the company that’s responsible for your privacy - is EasySkinz Limited
You can check your current consent status, to grant or revoke the same from here:
https://easyskinz.com/tools/privacy
This Privacy Policy describes how your personal information is collected, used, and shared when you visit or make a purchase from www.easyskinz.com (the “Site”).
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
When you visit the Site, we automatically collect certain information about your device, including information about your web browser, IP address, time zone, and some of the cookies that are installed on your device. Additionally, as you browse the Site, we collect information about the individual web pages or products that you view, what websites or search terms referred you to the Site, and information about how you interact with the Site. We refer to this automatically-collected information as “Device Information”.
We collect Device Information using the following technologies:
- “Cookies” are data files that are placed on your device or computer and often include an anonymous unique identifier. For more information about cookies, and how to disable cookies, visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org
- “Log files” track actions occurring on the Site, and collect data including your IP address, browser type, Internet service provider, referring/exit pages, and date/time stamps.
- “Web beacons”, “tags”, and “pixels” are electronic files used to record information about how you browse the Site.
- By using our website, you (the visitor) agree to allow third parties to process your IP address, in order to determine your location for the purpose of currency conversion. You also agree to have that currency stored in a session cookie in your browser (a temporary cookie which gets automatically removed when you close your browser). We do this in order for the selected currency to remain selected and consistent when browsing our website so that the prices can convert to your (the visitor) local currency.
Additionally when you make a purchase or attempt to make a purchase through the Site, we collect certain information from you, including your name, billing address, shipping address, payment information, email address, and phone number. We refer to this information as “Order Information”.
Our marketing pixels may use this information to count the success of different marketing campaigns.
Facebook Ads
Google AdWords
Google Analytics
Snap Pixel
Twitter Pixel
PaidOnResults Pixel (affiliate platform)
TrustedShops Pixel (reviews & buyer's protection platform)
When we talk about “Personal Information” in this Privacy Policy, we are talking both about Device Information and Order Information.
HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We use the Order Information that we collect generally to fulfill any orders placed through the Site (including processing your payment information, arranging for shipping, and providing you with invoices and/or order confirmations). Additionally, we use this Order Information to:
- Communicate with you;
- Screen our orders for potential risk or fraud; and
- When in line with the preferences you have shared with us, provide you with information or advertising relating to our products or services.
- Review request via e-mail after certain period of time, for example 45 days
We use the Device Information that we collect to help us screen for potential risk and fraud (in particular, your IP address), and more generally to improve and optimize our Site (for example, by generating analytics about how our customers browse and interact with the Site, and to assess the success of our marketing and advertising campaigns).
We also use this information for Retargeting campaigns, for example you may see some of our the visited by you products on Facebook, or provided as advertising by Google.
Text Marketing (SMS) and notifications: By subscribing to text notifications you agree to receive recurring automated marketing text messages at the phone number provided. Consent is not a condition of purchase. Text STOP to unsubscribe or HELP for help. Msg and data rates may apply. View Terms of use and privacy policy of your mobile provider. If you find it difficult to unsubscribe with SMS back, then please email us at privacy@easyskinz.com with your details and will remove them for you.
SHARING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We share your Personal Information with third parties to help us use your Personal Information, as described above.
For example, we use Shopify to power our online store-you can read more about how Shopify uses your Personal Information here:
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy
We also use Google Analytics to help us understand how our customers use the Site - you can read more about how Google uses your Personal Information here:
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/
Our Google Analytics account deletes automatically all data after 26 months, so even if you do not request that, your data will be deleted at some point, permanently.
You can also opt-out of Google Analytics here:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
Our main customer support e-mail is: hello@easyskinz.com
We will kindly ask you to get in touch with us using the stated e-mail above, so to be sure that your personal data is secure.
For our e-mail "hello@easyskinz.com" we use special Customer Support platform, called Zendesk. We keep all e-mails from you there, including personal data, which make our correspondence easier and better. We need this data sometimes to process refunds, or to send replacements, also to change your delivery address, if you requested so. Of course, if you want your data to be erased, simply send a request to privacy@easyskinz.com and we will pass this request to Zendesk, so to ensure that all your e-mails, including any personal data, will be deleted completely from their platform.
Zendesk EU data protection article:
https://www.zendesk.co.uk/company/customers-partners/eu-data-protection/
Snap (known as Snapchat): we use Snap Pixel to measure the success of our ads.  Data Protection article:
https://businesshelp.snapchat.com/en-US/article/snap-privacy-faq
Yotpo (reviews) Privacy Policy:
https://www.yotpo.com/privacy-policy/
TrustedShops - we use this platform to send you review requests, also to offer you theirs independent  £2,500 protection for your purchase. You can read their Privacy Policy here:
https://www.trustedshops.co.uk/imprint/
Omnisend - we use it for our e-mail bulletin, and for abandoned cart reminders. Of course, in order to receive our marketing / reminding e-mails, you will have to subscribe and give your consent during checkout. We already have asked all of our old customers and subscribers and some of them gave us a re-consent. You can find more about Omnisend's Privacy Policy here:
https://www.omnisend.com/privacy
Paid On Results - the Affiliate platform we use. Read theirs Privacy Policy here:
https://www.paidonresults.com/privacy.html
In order to offer you Klarna’s payment methods, we might in the checkout pass your personal data in the form of contact and order details to Klarna, in order for Klarna to assess whether you qualify for their payment methods and to tailor those payment methods for you. Your personal data transferred is processed in line with
Klarna’s own privacy notice
Finally, we may also share your Personal Information to comply with applicable laws and regulations, to respond to a subpoena, search warrant or other lawful request for information we receive, or to otherwise protect our rights.
BEHAVIOURAL ADVERTISING
As described above, we use your Personal Information to provide you with targeted advertisements or marketing communications we believe may be of interest to you. For more information about how targeted advertising works, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s (“NAI”) educational page at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/understanding-online-advertising/how-does-it-work
You can opt out of targeted advertising by using the links below:
- Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/settings/?tab=ads
- Google:
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/anonymous
- Bing:
https://advertise.bingads.microsoft.com/en-us/resources/policies/personalized-ads
Additionally, you can opt out of some of these services by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance’s opt-out portal at:
http://optout.aboutads.info/
STORAGE AND RETENTION OF YOUR DATA
As a minimum, we will store your data with our data processors (because we're data controller, and we do not store your data on our own servers) for as long as is reasonably necessary to provide you with the goods and services that you have requested from us, but in most cases we will retain certain of your personal data for as long as is reasonably necessary taking into consideration factors such as:
- our need to perform any agreements between you and us (including order fulfilment);
- our need to answer any queries or resolve any problems you may have;
- your continued consent to receive marketing and other emails and communications from us;
- our continued provision of our services to you; and
- our need to comply with legal requirements (e.g. relating to record keeping).
If you tell us that you would like to delete your account, we will take steps to delete all the personal data we hold about you once it is no longer necessary for us to hold it (e.g. to fulfil any outstanding orders, resolve disputes, or as is permitted by applicable law or regulation). The good news is that we don't require to have an account with us, so to place orders. You can checkout as a Guest.
For as long as we (our data processors) do store your data, we ensured that all of the data processors are following generally accepted industry standards and maintains reasonable safeguards to attempt to ensure the security, integrity, and privacy of the information you have provided. All of the platforms we work with have security measures in place designed to protect against the loss, misuse, and alteration of the information under our control. Personal data collected by the Company is stored in secure operating environments that are not available to the public. Shopify, the data processor which we use to store and run our online store, maintains information behind a firewall-protected server and uses SSL encryption for purchases made through our online store.
Notwithstanding our efforts to keep your personal data secure, no system can be 100% reliable. To the fullest extent permitted by law, we cannot be held liable for any loss you may suffer if a third party procures unauthorised access to any data you provide through the Channels. In addition, you are responsible for maintaining the strength and confidentiality of your login credentials.
We will notify you as soon as reasonably practicable if we have reason to believe that there has been a personal data breach by us (or your personal data held by us) which could adversely affect your rights and freedoms.
And as we described in this policy, you can, at anytime, request your data to be erased. Such a request you can send to privacy@easyskinz.com and we will make sure to forward the same to Shopify, and any other platforms that hold your data, because of your purchase or online behaviour in our online store. We believe that while using Shopify as data processor, we protect your data better, because Shopify is well know company, who has much higher budgets to ensure proper protection for its customers.
Under the GDPR, in most cases the merchant collects information from
their buyers as a controller. Generally, Shopify acts as a processor for the
merchant with respect to such buyer personal data (or, if the merchant
acts as a processor, Shopify acts as a subprocessor):
The one exception is for buyers with whom Shopify has a direct existing
relationship. For example:
● Buyers who use Shopify's Frenzy flash-sale app to access a
merchant's store
● Buyers who use Shopify Pay, which allows the buyer to store their
payment information with Shopify for use across different Shopify
stores
● Buyers who use Shopify’s Arrive app to track the status of orders
made from a merchant’s store
Although in such cases the merchant may also separately be a controller
of the buyer’s personal data, Shopify processes the personal data of
these buyers as a controller.
DO NOT TRACK
Please note that we do not alter our Site’s data collection and use practices when we see a Do Not Track signal from your browser.
COOKIES
A cookie is a small file of letters and numbers stored on your browser or the hard drive of your computer. Cookies contain information that is transferred to your computer's hard drive.
Our website uses cookies to distinguish you from other users of our website. This helps us to provide you with a better experience when you browse our website and also allows us to improve our website.
Some data collected by cookies is collected on an anonymous and/or aggregated basis. Where we use cookies that contain personal data, we will only process that personal data as set out in this policy.
Our websites use some or all of the following cookies:
Strictly necessary cookies. These are cookies that are required for the operation of our website. They include, for example, cookies that enable you to log into secure areas of our website, use a shopping cart or make use of e-billing services.
Analytical/performance cookies. These allow us to recognise and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our website when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily.
Functionality cookies. These are used to recognise you when you return to our website. This enables us to personalise our content for you, greet you by name and remember your preferences (for example, your choice of language or region).
Targeting cookies. These cookies record your visit to our website, the pages you have visited and the links you have followed. We will use this information to make our website and the advertising displayed on it more relevant to your interests. We may also share this information with third parties for this purpose.
Purpose
Please note third parties (including, for example, advertising networks and providers of external services like web traffic analysis services) may also use cookies, over which we have no control. These cookies are likely to be analytical/performance cookies or targeting cookies.
Your browser may give you the ability to block all or some cookies by activating a setting in your browser's options. However, if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to access all or parts of our website.
Except for essential cookies, all cookies will remain unless the cookie cache is cleared (unless otherwise indicated in the table above).
HOW DO I DISABLE COOKIES?
If you want to disable cookies you need to change your website browser settings to reject cookies. How you can do this will depend on the browser you use. Further details on how to disable cookies for the most popular browsers are set out below:
For Microsoft Internet Explorer:
Choose the menu "tools" then "Internet Options"
Click on the “privacy” tab
Select the setting the appropriate setting
For Google Chrome:
Choose Settings > Advanced
Under "Privacy and security," click “Content settings”.
Click “Cookies”
For Safari:
Choose Preferences > Privacy
Click on "Remove all Website Data"
For Mozilla firefox:
Choose the menu "tools" then "Options"
Click on the icon "privacy"
Find the menu "cookie" and select the relevant options
For Opera 6.0 and further:
Choose the menu "Files" > "Preferences"
Privacy
YOUR RIGHTS
If you are a European resident, you have the right to access personal information we hold about you and to ask that your personal information be corrected, updated, or deleted. If you would like to exercise this right, please contact us through the contact information below:
privacy@easyskinz.com
Additionally, if you are a European resident we note that we are processing your information in order to fulfill contracts we might have with you (for example if you make an order through the Site), or otherwise to pursue our legitimate business interests listed above. Additionally, please note that your information will be transferred outside of Europe, including to Canada and the United States.
DATA RETENTION
When you place an order through the Site, we will maintain your Order Information for our records unless and until you ask us to delete this information.
CHANGES
We may update this privacy policy from time to time in order to reflect, for example, changes to our practices or for other operational, legal or regulatory reasons.
MINORS
The Site is not intended for individuals under the age of 18
CONTACT US
For more information about our privacy practices, if you have questions, or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact us by e-mail at privacy@easyskinz.com or by mail using the details provided below:
QSKINZ
PO BOX: 725
FAREHAM
PO14 9QR
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://easyskinz.com/tools/privacy:
This
qskinz.com
page can’t be found
No webpage was found for the web address:
https://qskinz.com/tools/privacy
HTTP ERROR 404
Reload
No webpage was found for the web address:
https://qskinz.com/tools/privacy
Sub-policy 1
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to Content
Updated March 2, 2023
Privacy Policy
How Shopify handles your data
Table of Contents
Introduction
Our values
Why we process your information
Your rights over your information
Where we send your information
How long do we retain your information
Our use of Machine Learning
How we protect your information
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
How you can reach us
United States Regional Privacy Notice
Introduction
In our mission to make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use information about you, our
merchants using Shopify
to power your business
customers
who shop at a Shopify-powered business
partners
who develop apps for merchants to use, build stores on behalf of merchants, refer potential entrepreneurs to Shopify, or otherwise help merchants operate or improve their Shopify-powered business
users of Shopify apps
and services like
Shop
or
Shop Pay
visitors to
Shopify’s websites
, or anyone contacting
Shopify support
This Privacy Policy will help you better understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information. If we change our privacy practices, we may update this privacy policy. If any changes are significant, we will let you know (for example, through the Shopify admin or by email).
Our values
Trust is the foundation of the Shopify platform and includes trusting us to do the right thing with your information. Three main values guide us as we develop our products and services. These values should help you better understand how we think about your information and privacy.
Your information belongs to you
We carefully analyze what types of information we need to provide our services, and we try to limit the information we collect to only what we really need. Where possible, we delete or anonymize this information when we no longer need it. When building and improving our products, our engineers work closely with our privacy and security teams to build with privacy in mind. In all of this work our guiding principle is that your information belongs to you, and we aim to only use your information to your benefit.
We protect your information from others
If a third party requests your personal information, we will refuse to share it unless you give us permission or we are legally required. When we are legally required to share your personal information, we will tell you in advance, unless we are legally forbidden.
We help merchants and partners meet their privacy obligations
Many of the merchants and partners using Shopify do not have the benefit of a dedicated privacy team, and it is important to us to help them meet their privacy obligations. To do this, we try to build our products and services so they can easily be used in a privacy-friendly way. We also provide detailed FAQs and documentation covering the most important privacy topics, and respond to privacy-related questions we receive.
Why we process your information
We generally process your information when we need to do so to fulfill a contractual obligation (for example, to process your subscription payments to use the Shopify platform), or where we or someone we work with needs to use your personal information for a reason related to their business (for example, to provide you with a service). Laws in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in the United Kingdom (“UK”) call these reasons “legitimate interests.” These “legitimate interests” include:
preventing risk and fraud
answering questions or providing other types of support
helping merchants find and use apps through our app store
providing and improving our products and services
providing reporting and analytics
testing out features or additional services
assisting with marketing, advertising, or other communications
We only process personal information for these “legitimate interests” after considering the potential risks to your privacy and balancing any risks with certain measures—for example, by providing clear transparency into our privacy practices, offering you control over your personal information where appropriate, limiting the information we keep, limiting what we do with your information, who we send your information to, how long we keep your information, or the technical measures we use to protect your information.
We may also process your personal information where you have provided your consent. In particular, where we cannot rely on an alternative legal basis for processing, where you direct us to transfer information to a third party, where we receive your data from a third party is sourced and it already comes with consent or where we are required by law to ask for your consent (including in the context of some of our sales and marketing activities). At any time, you have a right to withdraw your consent by changing your communication choices, opting out from our communications or by contacting us.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, to understand our purposes for processing, categories of recipients and legal basis for processing for each type of personal data.
Your rights over your information
We believe you should be able to access and control your personal information no matter where you live. Depending on how you use Shopify, you may have the right to request access to, correct, amend, delete, port to another service provider, restrict, or object to certain uses of your personal information. We will not charge you more or provide you with a different level of service if you exercise any of these rights. Please note that a number of these rights apply only in certain circumstances, and all of these rights may be limited by law.
If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store and wish to exercise these rights over information about your purchase or interaction, you need to directly contact the merchant you interacted with. We are a processor and process information on their behalf. We will of course help our merchants to fulfill these requests to the extent required by law, such as by giving them the tools to do so and by answering their questions.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with, please submit your data subject request through our
online portal
. Please note that if you send us a request relating to your personal information, we have to make sure that it is you before we can respond. In order to do so, we may use a third party to collect and verify identification documents. Further information about rights available to US residents can be found below under the header “United States Regional Privacy Notice”.
If you are not happy with our response to a request, you can contact us to resolve the issue. If you are located in the EEA or UK, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or privacy authority at any time.
Finally, because there is no common understanding about what a
“Do Not Track”
signal is supposed to mean, we don’t respond to those signals in any particular way.
Where we send your information
We are a Canadian company, but we work with and process data about individuals across the world. To operate our business, we may send your personal information outside of your state, province, or country, including to the United States. This data may be subject to the laws of the countries where we send it. We take steps to protect your information when we send your information across borders.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant.
Transfers outside of Europe and Switzerland
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information is controlled by our Irish affiliate, Shopify International Ltd. Your information is then sent to other Shopify locations and to service providers who may be located in other regions, including Canada (where we are based) and the United States. When we send your personal information outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, when we send your personal information to Canada it is protected under Canadian law, which the European Commission has found adequately protects your information. If we then send this personal information outside of Canada (for example, when we send this information to our
Subprocessors
), this information is protected by contractual commitments that are comparable to those provided in the
Standard Contractual Clauses.
Finally, while we do what we can to protect your information, we may at times be legally required to disclose your personal information (for example, if we receive a valid court order). For information about how we respond to such orders, please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
How long do we retain your information
We will retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information or store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, for further details on the retention of your personal information.
Our use of Machine Learning
One of the ways in which we are able to help merchants using Shopify is by using techniques like “machine learning” (some laws, including certain EEA and UK laws, may refer to this as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our services. When we use machine learning, we either: (1) still have a human being involved in the process (and so are not fully automated); or (2) use machine learning in ways that don’t have legal or similarly significant effects (for example, reordering how apps might appear when you visit the app store).
How we protect your information
Our teams work tirelessly to protect your information, and to ensure the security and integrity of our platform. We also have independent auditors assess the security of our data storage and systems that process financial information. However, we all know that no method of transmission over the Internet, and method of electronic storage, can be 100% secure. This means we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your personal information. You can find more information about our security measures at
/ie/security
.
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
We use
cookies
and similar tracking technologies on our website and when providing our services. For more information about how we use these technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on our sites, a list of cookies that we place when we power a merchant’s store, and an explanation of how you can opt out of certain types of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about, make a request relating to, or complain about how we process your personal information, please contact
Shopify Support
, or mail us at one of the addresses below. If you would like to submit a legally binding request to demand someone else’s personal information (for example, if you have a subpoena or court order), please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with and you are located in the EEA or UK, Shopify International Ltd is the controller of your personal data. If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store, the merchant is your data controller and we are acting as a processor on their behalf.
If you have questions about how a merchant or store processes your personal information, you should contact the merchant or visit their privacy policy.
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, the Middle East, South America, or Africa:
Shopify International Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Intertrust Ireland
2nd Floor 1-2 Victoria Buildings
Haddington Road
Dublin 4, D04 XN32
Ireland
If you are located in Asia, Australia, or New Zealand:
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
United States Regional Privacy Notice
This United States Regional Privacy Notice (“US Notice”) supplements our Privacy Policy and all supplemental privacy policies on
www.shopify.com
(together, the “Shopify Privacy Policies”).
This US Notice is for individuals residing in certain US states and is designed to help you better understand how we collect, use, and disclose your personal information and, depending on how you use Shopify and where you reside, how to exercise available rights under various applicable privacy laws in the US, specifically the California Consumer Privacy Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, the “US Privacy Laws”).
What information we collect and share about you
To provide our apps and services to you, we must process information about you, including personal information.
We do not “sell” your personal information as that term is defined under US Privacy Laws.
Here is a summary of the categories of personal information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months and with whom we may have disclosed that information to, depending on how you use Shopify.
Categories of personal information collected
Recipients of personal information
Identifiers, including name, email address, mailing address, phone number;
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute, including name, mailing and billing address, phone number, credit or debit card information;
Commercial information, including products you purchase, place in your shopping cart, favorite or review (if you are a customer) and information you provide us about you and your business (if you are a merchant);
Photos and videos, which may include face imagery, if you choose to provide them.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including information regarding the device and browser you use, network connection, IP address, and how you browse through our apps and sites;
Geolocation data, including your mailing and billing address;
Inferences, or information derived from other personal information about you, which could include your preferences, interests, and other information used to personalize your experience;
Other information you provide; and
Sensitive personal information, which may include:
Government-issued identifiers, including social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
Your account access credentials (such as account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account);
Your device’s precise location (if you are a Shop App user, but only when you allow Shop to access this information);
Information you voluntarily disclose that may reveal certain characteristics about you such as your racial or ethnic origin or sexual orientation
The contents of email messages in the email inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history (if you use Shop).
Companies who help us provide you with our services, including cloud storage providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, security vendors, email providers, marketplaces and data analytics vendors;
Advertisers and marketing vendors;
Merchants whose shops you visit or make purchases from;
Partners who provide a range of services to merchants, such as by developing apps or themes for use by merchants, serving as an affiliate that refers potential merchants to us, or helping merchants build or manage stores;
Law enforcement or other third parties in connection with legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Why we collect and share your Personal Information
We use and share your personal information for the purposes set out in the Shopify Privacy Policies. For categories of sensitive personal information that we collect, we only use or disclose such information either with your specific consent when required, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sources of Personal Information
To make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use personal information provided by:
You: We collect the information you provide when you use our platform, including when you sign up for Shopify as a merchant, visit a Shopify-powered store, fill in order information, visit one of Shopify’s websites or contact Shopify support. We collect account and payment information you provide to us (including information about your business if you are a merchant), Shopify stores or items you save to favorites, purchases you make, reviews you post, and how you otherwise interact or communicate with stores or other users on our apps or services. We also collect information about how you browse through our apps and sites, including search terms you may enter.
Your device(s): We collect information from and about the devices you use, including computers, phones, and other web-connected devices you use to access our apps or services, and we combine this information across different devices you use.
Third parties: We receive information from partners who help us provide you with our services including the following:
Email providers. If you use the Shop App and you connect your third party inboxes, such as Gmail or Outlook (according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law), we receive information to identify shopping-related emails and display within Shop information about specific orders you have made, stores you have engaged with in the past, and other related information.
Service Providers. We receive information from our service providers, who help us provide services to our merchants, like reviewing accounts for fraud or other concerns.
Marketplaces. If you use the Shop App, we receive information about purchases you have made from other marketplaces or platforms, such as Amazon, that you choose to connect through Shop. This information helps us to provide and improve Shop, to personalize your experience using our apps and services, and to determine if you are eligible for specific offers or payment methods.
Subprocessors. We work with third party subprocessors for cloud hosting, content delivery, data analysis, internal logging, fulfillment services and email transmission, among others, to provide you with our services. For more information, see Shopify’s subprocessors.
Analytics and cookie providers. We receive information through our use of cookies, social plugins (such as the Facebook “like” button), pixels and tags for business purposes, such as providing information to help measure how users interact with our website content. For more information about how we use these technologies, see our Cookie Policy.
How long we keep your information
Because we need your personal information to provide Shopify services, we generally keep your personal information, including sensitive personal information, while you use Shopify products or services or until you tell us to delete your information. We may also keep personal information to comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests.
If you are a merchant operating a Shopify-powered store, and you close the store, stop paying your subscription fees, or we terminate your account, we retain store information for two years before we begin the deletion process.
When you visit or make a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, we act as a service provider or processor for the merchant, and the merchant, not Shopify, decides how long your information is retained.
Your rights over your information
Depending on where you live, how you use Shopify, and subject to certain exceptions, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to Know: The right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices.
Right to Request Correction: The right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Right to Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete personal information that we have collected about you.
To exercise your rights, including the “right to know” and “right to delete,” please submit a request through our online portal. If you use Shop or Shop Pay, please visit
https://shop.app/delete-account
for instructions on how to request deletion of your information.
If you have visited or made a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, please contact the specific merchant directly. If you make a request to us, we will forward your request to the relevant merchant.
Please note that to protect your information and the integrity of our products and services, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request. In some cases we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as your email address or a government issued ID.
Under US Privacy Laws, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf. If you use an authorized agent to submit a request, we may need to collect additional information, such as a government issued ID, to verify your identity before processing your request to protect your information.
For information on the CCPA requests we have received, please see here. In certain states, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights. If you wish to appeal a decision, please contact Shopify Support.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about or have concerns about how we process your personal information, please contact Shopify Support. If you want to make a request relating to your personal information, please contact us using the methods set out in the section immediately above.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Sub-policy 3
https://businesshelp.snapchat.com/en-US/article/snap-privacy-faq:
Loading
×
Sorry to interrupt
This page has an error. You might just need to refresh it.
Error in $A.getCallback() [c is not a function]
Callback failed: serviceComponent://ui.force.components.controllers.hostConfig.HostConfigController/ACTION$getConfigData
Failing descriptor: {markup://force:hostConfig}
Cookies
Cookies help us:
Power this website and monitor its performance.
Remember your preferences and improve your experience.
Understand how you use this website.
Deliver relevant ads and measure their effectiveness.
To continue, select one of the following options:
Cookie Menu
for an a la carte cookie experience.
Accept All
for all cookies and the most enhanced experience.
Essential Only
for the most basic experience.
Interested in the details? Read our
Cookie Policy
Loading
Check your Internet connection and try again.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.yotpo.com/privacy-policy/:
Privacy Policy
Effective Date
:  February 6, 2024
Yotpo Ltd. (together with its affiliates companies – “
Yotpo
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) puts great efforts in making sure that personal data processed by us is safe and used properly, and that our data practices are properly communicated to our Clients, Users and Prospects.
This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, store, use, and disclose the following types of personal data:
Client-Owned Data
: data relating to identified or identifiable individuals that we collect, process and manage on our Clients’ behalf, as part of the Yotpo eCommerce marketing platform (“
Platform
”). Such data (“
Client-Owned Data
”) relates to individuals who register as end-users, place purchases on, or otherwise interact with our Clients’ online stores, and to their interactions with our Services;
Yotpo User Data
: contact, contractual and billing details concerning our Clients, which may also contain the details of their internal focal persons who directly engage with Yotpo concerning their organizational account, and users of the Platform on behalf of such Clients, e.g., the account administrators and users, billing contacts and authorized signatories on behalf of the Client; as well as the Client’s needs and preferences, as identified to us or recognized through our engagement with them (“
Users
” and “
User Data
” as relevant);
Yotpo Prospect Data
: data relating to our Clients, visitors of our website (
https://www.yotpo.com/
), participants at our events, and any other prospective client or partner who visits or otherwise interacts with any of our websites, online ads and content, emails or communications under our control (“
Sites
” and collectively with the Platform, the “
Services
”) (“
Prospect
” and “
Prospect Data
” as relevant);
Specifically, this Privacy Policy describes our practices regarding:
Data Collection & Processing
Data Uses
Data Location
Data Retention
Data Disclosure
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Communications
Data Security
Data Subject Rights
Data Controller/Processor
Additional Notice & Contact Details
If you are our Client, User, or Prospect (“you”), please read this Privacy Policy carefully and make sure that you fully understand and agree to it. If you are a Client, please also review the Terms of Service, which governs your use of the Services.
You are not legally required to provide us with any personal data, and may do so (or avoid doing so) at your own free will. If you do not wish to provide us with your personal data, or to have it processed by us or any of our Service Providers (defined below), please avoid any interaction with us including visiting our Sites or using our Services. If you are a User of the Services on behalf of any of our Clients, we suggest that you contact your account administrator with any questions.
1. Data Collection & Processing
(i) Client-Owned Data
: Our Services provide our Clients with a wide variety of tools and features to better manage and optimize their end-users’ experience and interaction with the Client’s online assets.
Certain privacy and data protection laws require that prior to processing personal data, a legal basis for such processing be established. Accordingly, while Yotpo supports these laws by providing our Clients with features and options for how they use our Services –
our Client is solely responsible for determining whether and how they wish to use our Services and such features, and to ensure that the appropriate legal basis for the processing of Client-Owned Data has been established by the Client, prior to having such data processed through the Services
.
Yotpo processes Client-Owned Data, and the personal data contained in it,
strictly on our Client’s behalf
, in accordance with their reasonable instructions and as further stipulated in our
Data Processing Addendum
and other commercial agreements with such Client.
Accordingly, to the extent applicable by law,
our Client will be deemed the ‘data controller’
(e.g. under the EU GDPR, UK GDPR and similar laws)
or ‘business’
(under the CCPA/CPRA or similar laws) of Client-Owned Data; and Yotpo will be deemed the ‘
data processor
’ or ‘
service provider
’ when processing such data, as further described in
Section 10
below.
(ii) Yotpo User Data
: User Data we collect and generate, includes some or all of the following types of personal data:
User account information
(e-mail address and, when applicable, hashed password);
profile and contact information
(name, title, team, company, e-mail and phone number, and additional information submitted by a Client or a User);
Platform usage information
(connectivity, technical and aggregated usage data, such as user agent, IP addresses, device data (like type, OS, device id, browser version, locale and language settings used), activity logs, session recordings, and the cookies installed or utilized on their device); and
direct interactions and communications with us
– (including recordings and transcripts of your calls and emails with us, e.g. for user enablement, support, and training purposes).
While Yotpo may process some User Data on its Clients’ behalf, as its ‘data processor’ or ‘service provider’ we also use it for our own purposes, (as described in
Section 2
below) as an independent and separate ‘data controller’ or ‘business’ (as further described in
Section 10
below).
(iii) Yotpo Prospect Data
: We collect and generate the following types of personal data concerning our Clients and Prospects:
Website usage information
(connectivity, technical and aggregated usage data, such as user agent, IP addresses, device data (like type, OS, device id, browser version, locale and language settings used), activity logs, session recordings, and the cookies and pixels installed or utilized on their device;
Information concerning our Clients and Prospects
(contact and business details, our communications with such Clients and Prospects, as well as any needs, preferences, attributes, and insights relevant to our potential engagement);
direct interactions and communications with us
(including recordings and transcripts of your calls, emails, form submissions and interactions with us via our website chat feature, e.g. for Client support, feedback, training purposes, etc.)
We collect such data either automatically, through the data subject’s interaction with us or with our Sites or Services; or through third-party services, social media, analytics tools, events we organize or participate in, and other business initiatives.
For the purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), specifically in the last twelve (12) months, we have collected the following categories of personal information: Identifiers; Commercial Information; Customer Record Information; Internet or other electronic network activity information; Geolocation Data; Audio, Electronic, or Similar Information; and Inferences. Yotpo does not collect sensitive personal information.
2. Data Uses
We use personal data for the following purposes and in reliance on the lawful bases noted in the chart below:
User Data
Purpose
Legal basis for processing
To facilitate, operate, and provide our Service.
▪  Legitimate Interest
▪  Performance of a Contract
To authenticate the identity of our Users, and to allow them to access our Service.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Performance of a Contract
To provide our Users with assistance and support.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Performance of a Contract
To evaluate and develop new features, technologies, and improvements to the Service.
▪   Legitimate Interest
User & Prospect Data
To gain a better understanding on how individuals use and interact with our Sites and Services, and how we could improve their and others’ user experience, and continue improving our products, offerings and the overall performance of our Services.
▪   Consent (where applicable)
▪   Legitimate Interest
To facilitate and optimize our marketing campaigns, ad management and sales operations, and to manage and deliver advertisements for our products and services more effectively, including on other websites and applications. Such activities allow us to highlight the benefits of using our Services, and thereby increase Client’s engagement and overall satisfaction with our Services. This includes contextual, behavioral and interests-based advertising based on Client’s activity, preferences or other data available to us or to our business partners.
▪   Legitimate Interest
To provide our Prospects with assistance and support.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Performance of a Contract
To explore and pursue growth opportunities by facilitating a stronger local presence and tailored experiences.
▪   Legitimate Interest
To contact our Prospects (whether existing or prospective) with general or personalized service-related messages, as well as promotional messages that may be of specific interest to them.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Consent
To facilitate, sponsor and offer certain events, contests and promotions.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Consent
To publish your feedback and submissions to our Sites, public forums and blogs.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Consent
To support and enhance our data security measures, including for the purposes of preventing and mitigating the risks of fraud, error or any illegal or prohibited activity.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Performance of a Contract
To create aggregated data, inferred non-personal data or anonymized or pseudonymized data (de-identified data), which we or our business partners may use to provide and improve our respective services, conduct research, or for any other purpose.
▪   Legitimate Interest
▪   Performance of a Contract
▪   Compliance with legal obligations
To comply with applicable laws and regulations.
▪   Compliance with legal obligations
3. Data Location
We and our authorized Service Providers (defined below) maintain, store and process personal data in the United States of America, Israel, the United Kingdom, European Union, Australia, the Philippines, and other locations, as reasonably necessary for the proper performance and delivery of our Services, or as may be required by law; provided that
Client-Owned Data
may only be processed in such locations as permitted in our
Data Processing Addendum
and other commercial agreements with such Client.
While privacy laws may vary between jurisdictions, Yotpo and its affiliates and Service Providers are committed to protect personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and customary industry standards, and such appropriate lawful mechanisms and contractual terms requiring adequate data protection, regardless of any lesser legal requirements that may apply in the jurisdiction to which such data is transferred.
Yotpo Ltd. is headquartered in Israel, and Yotpo UK Limited is established in the UK. Both jurisdictions are considered by the European Commission, the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC), and the UK Secretary of State to be offering an adequate level of protection for the personal data of residents of the EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. We transfer personal data from the EEA, Switzerland and the UK to Israel on this basis. For data transfers from the EU, Switzerland or the UK to countries which are not considered to be offering an adequate level of data protection, we and the relevant data exporters and importers have entered into Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Commission, FDPIC and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO). You can request a copy of the applicable SCCs by contacting us as indicated in
Section 11
below.
Yotpo Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and will be further liable in cases of onward transfers of your personal data to third parties (including our Service Providers).
Yotpo Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Yotpo Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern for personal data transferred under the DPF. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
4. Data Retention
We retain
Client-Owned Data
strictly on our Client’s behalf, in accordance with their reasonable instructions and as further stipulated in our
Data Processing Addendum
and other commercial agreements with such Client.
We retain
User Data
and
Prospect Data
for as long as it is reasonably necessary to maintain and expand our relationship and provide you with our Services and offerings; to comply with our legal and contractual obligations; or to protect ourselves from any potential disputes (i.e. as required by laws applicable to log-keeping, records and bookkeeping, and in order to have proof and evidence concerning our relationship, should any legal issues arise following your discontinuance of use), all in accordance with our data retention policy. Please note that except as required by applicable law or our specific agreements with you, we will not be obligated to retain your personal data for any particular period, and we are free to securely delete it or restrict access to it for any reason and at any time, with or without notice to you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and the applicable legal requirements.
If you have any questions about our data retention policy, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@yotpo.com
.
5. Data Disclosure
Legal Compliance
: In exceptional circumstances, and except as stipulated otherwise in our
Data Processing Addendum
and other commercial agreements with you, we may disclose or allow government and law enforcement officials access to your personal data, in response to a subpoena, search warrant or court order (or similar requirement), or in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Such disclosure or access may occur if we believe in good faith that: (a) we are legally compelled to do so; (b) disclosure is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding actual or suspected illegal activity, fraud, or other wrongdoing; or (c) such disclosure is required to protect our legitimate business interests, including the security or integrity of our products and services.
Service Providers
: We may engage selected third-party companies and individuals to perform services complementary to our own. Such service providers include hosting and server co-location services, communications and content delivery networks (CDNs), data and cyber security services, billing and payment processing services, fraud detection and prevention services, web and mobile analytics, data enrichment, e-mail and/or SMS distribution and monitoring services, call, session or activity recording and analysis services, remote access services, performance measurement, data optimization and marketing services, social and advertising networks, content providers, e-mail, voicemails, support and customer relation management systems, and our legal, financial and compliance advisors (collectively, “
Service Providers
“).
These Service Providers may have access to your personal data, depending on each of their specific roles and purposes in facilitating and enhancing our Services, and may only use it for such limited purposes as determined in our agreements with them.
Partnerships
: We engage selected business and channel partners, resellers, distributors and providers (
collectively, “Partners”)
of professional services related to our Services, which allow us to explore and pursue growth opportunities by facilitating a stronger local presence and tailored experiences for our prospective and existing Clients and Users. In such instances, we may
disclose
relevant contact, business and usage details with the respective Partner, to allow them to engage with those Clients and Users for such purposes. If you directly engage with any of our Partners, please note that any aspect of that engagement which is not directly related to the Services and directed by Yotpo is beyond the scope of Yotpo’s Terms and Privacy Policy,  and may therefore be governed by the partner’s terms and privacy policy.
Event Sponsors
:
If you attend an event or webinar organized by us, or download or access an asset on our Sites related to such an event, webinar or other activity involving third-party sponsors or presenters, we may
disclose
your personal data with them. If required by applicable law, you may consent to such
disclosure
via the registration form or by allowing your attendee badge to be scanned at a sponsor booth. In these circumstances, your personal data will be subject to the sponsors’ privacy statements. If you do not wish for your personal data to be
disclosed
, you may choose to not opt-in via event/webinar registration or elect to not have your badge scanned, or you can opt-out in accordance with
Section
‎
9
below.
Clients and other Users
:
Client-Owned Data
is typically disclosed and is available to the Users belonging to such Client’s account.
Yotpo User Data
is disclosed to the administrator of the Client’s account to which such User belongs (including data and communications concerning such user’s account). In such cases, disclosure of such data means that the administrator(s) or other users of the same account may access it on behalf of the Client, and will be able to monitor, process and analyze the personal data contained therein. This includes instances where you may contact us for help in resolving an issue specific to a team of which you are a member (and which is managed by the same Client).
Please note that Yotpo is not responsible for and does not control any further disclosure, use or monitoring by or on behalf of the Client, that itself acts as the ‘data controller’ of such data (as further described in
Section 10
below).
Protecting Rights and Safety
: We may disclose personal data with others if we believe in good faith that this will help protect the rights, property, or personal safety of Yotpo, any of our Users or Clients, or any members of the general public.
Yotpo
Subsidiaries and Affiliated Companies
: We may disclose personal data internally within our group, for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. In addition, should Yotpo or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates undergo any change in control or ownership, including by means of merger, acquisition or purchase of substantially all or part of its assets, personal data may be disclosed or transferred to the parties involved in such an event. If we believe that such a change in control might materially affect your personal data then stored with us, we will notify you of this event and the choices you may have via e-mail or a prominent notice on our Services.
For the avoidance of doubt, Yotpo may disclose User Data and Prospect Data in additional manners, pursuant to your explicit approval, or if we are legally obligated to do so, or if we have successfully rendered such data non-personal, non-identifiable and anonymous. We may transfer, disclose or otherwise use non-personal and non-identifiable data at our sole discretion and without the need for further approval.
For the purpose of the CCPA, in the last 12 months, we may have disclosed Identifiers; Internet or other electronic network activity information; Geolocation Data; Commercial Information; Customer Record Information; Audio, Electronic or Similar Information; and Inferences for legal compliance, to Service Providers, to Clients and other Users, for protecting rights and safety and to Yotpo Subsidiaries and Affiliated Companies. We may have disclosed Identifiers; Internet or other electronic network activity information; Geolocation Data; Customer Record Information; Commercial Information; and Inferences with Partners and Event Sponsors.
6. Cookies and Tracking Technologies
We and our Service Providers use cookies, pixels, tags and other technologies in order for us to provide and monitor our Services and Sites, to ensure that they perform properly, to analyze our performance and marketing activities, and to personalize your experience. Such cookies and similar files or tags may also be temporarily placed on your device. Certain cookies and other technologies serve to recall personal data, such as an IP address, as indicated by you. To learn more about our practices concerning cookies and tracking, please see our
Cookie Policy
. You may also use the “Cookie Settings” feature available in our footer depending on your location and activity on our Services, as applicable.
7. Communications
We engage in service and promotional communications, through e-mail, phone, SMS and notifications.
Service Communications
: We may contact you with information regarding our Services. For example, we may send you notifications (through any means available to us) of changes or updates to our Services or legal terms, billing issues, log-in attempts or password reset notices, etc. Our Clients, and other Users on the same Client account, may also send you notifications, messages and other updates regarding their or your use of the Services.
Promotional Communications
: We may also notify you about new features, additional offerings, events, special opportunities or any other information of a promotional nature we think you will find valuable, as our Client, User or Prospect. We may provide such notices through any of the contact means available to us (e.g. phone, mobile or e-mail), through the Services, or through our marketing campaigns on any other sites or platforms.
You can typically control your communications and notifications settings from your Yotpo user profile settings, or otherwise in accordance with the instructions included in the communications sent to you. Please note that you will not be able to opt-out of receiving certain service communications which are integral to your use (like password resets or billing notices). If you do not wish to receive promotional communications, you may notify us at any time by sending an e-mail to:
privacy@yotpo.com
, changing your communications preferences in your user profile settings, or by following the “unsubscribe”, “stop”, “opt-out” or “change e-mail preferences” instructions contained in the promotional communications you receive.
8. Data Security
To protect your personal data held with us, we use industry-standard physical, procedural and technical security measures, including encryption as appropriate. However, please be aware that regardless of any security measures used, we cannot and do not guarantee the absolute protection and security of any personal data stored with us or with any third parties as described in
Section 5
above. To learn more, please visit our
Security page
.
9. Data Subject Rights
Individuals have rights concerning their personal data under applicable law, including the EU or UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) or the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA), or the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA).
Such rights may include, to the extent applicable: (i) to know/request access to personal data (specific pieces of personal data collected; categories of personal data collected; categories of sources from whom the personal data was collected; purpose of collecting personal data; categories of third-parties to whom we have disclosed personal data), (ii)  to request rectification or erasure of personal data held with Yotpo, (iii) to restrict or object to such personal data’s processing (including the right to direct us not to sell your personal data to third parties now or in the future), (iv)  to port such personal data, or (v) to equal services and prices (each to the extent available to you under the laws which apply to you).  To exercise any of these rights you may have, please contact us by e-mail at:
privacy@yotpo.com
.
You may also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority.
Please note that when you ask us to exercise any of your rights under this policy or applicable law, we may need to ask you to provide certain credentials to make sure that you are who you claim you are (to avoid disclosure to you of personal data related to others) and to provide further information to better understand the nature and scope of data for which you request access. Such additional data will be then retained by us for legal purposes (e.g. as proof of the identity of the person submitting the request, or proof of request fulfillment).
We may redact from the data that we will make available to you, any personal data or confidential information related to others.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPP and the Swiss-U.S. DPF  Principles, Yotpo Inc. commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal data. EEA, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data Privacy Framework compliance should submit inquiries to
dpo@yotpo.com
. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related compliant from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related compliant to your satisfaction, Yotpo Inc. has further committed to cooperate with EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner Office (UK ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) to independently address complaints that we have been unable to resolve.
Please note that under certain conditions (as described under the DPF Principles Yotpo adheres to) you can invoke a binding arbitration by delivering a notice to Yotpo Inc. via
dpo@yotpo.com
. Please also note that Yotpo Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
If your request relates to personal data that we process on our Client’s behalf (i.e. Customer Data), you should contact such Client directly
, as they are the “data controller” of such data (see
Section 10
below). Note that such Client exclusively determines how such data may be processed, as well as if, and how, your request should be handled – so we advise that you submit your request directly to them. We will not fulfill your request unless you have provided sufficient information that enables us to reasonably verify that you are the individual about whom we collected the personal data, and if such data is processed on behalf of any of our Clients – to which Client it particularly relates, so that we may forward it to them for their further handling.
10. Data Controller/Processor
Certain data protection laws and regulations, such as the EU GDPR, UK GDPR or the CCPA/CPRA, typically distinguish between two main roles for parties processing personal data: the “
data controller
” (or under the CCPA/CPRA, “
business
”), who determines the purposes and means of processing; and the “
data processor
” (or under the CCPA/CPRA, “
service provider
”), who processes the data on behalf of the data controller (or business). Below we explain how these roles apply to our Services, to the extent such laws and regulations apply.
Yotpo is the “data controller” of Yotpo Prospect Data
. With respect to such data, we assume the responsibilities of data controller (solely to the extent applicable under law) as set forth in this Privacy Policy. In such instances, our Service Providers processing such data will assume the role of “data processor”.
Yotpo is the “data processor” of Client-Owned Data
, which we process on behalf of our Client (who is the “data controller” of such data); and our Service Providers, who process such Client-Owned Data on our behalf, are the “
sub-processors
” of such data.
Yotpo is both a “data controller” and “data processor” of Yotpo User Data
. Such data is processed by Yotpo for its own purposes (as described in
Section 2
above) as an independent ‘controller’; while certain portions of it which are included in
Client-Owned Data
are processed by us on our Client’s behalf, as a ‘processor’.
Accordingly, Yotpo processes
Client-Owned Data
strictly in accordance with such Client’s reasonable instructions and as further stipulated in our
Data Processing Addendum
and other commercial agreements with such Client. The Client, as controller of such data, will be responsible for meeting any legal requirements applicable to data controllers (such as establishing a legal basis for processing and responding to Data Subject Rights requests concerning the data they control).
For the avoidance of doubt, each Client is solely responsible for establishing a legal basis for proceeding and providing adequate notice to their account users and clients whose data may be contained in Client-Owned Data (including sufficient reference to the processing of their personal data via the Services), and any other information necessary to comply with all applicable privacy and data protection laws; as well as for obtaining all approvals and consents from such individuals as required under such laws.
11. Additional Notices
Updates and Amendments
: We may update and amend this Privacy Policy from time to time by posting an amended version on our Services. The amended version will be effective as of the date it is published. We will provide prior notice if we believe any substantial changes are involved via any of the communication means available to us or via the Services. After such notice period, all amendments shall be deemed accepted by you.
Requirements under US State Privacy Laws:
This policy describes the categories of personal information we may collect and the sources of such information (in
Section
‎
1
above), and our retention (
Section
‎
4
) and deletion (
Section
‎
9
) practices. We also included information about how we may process your information (in Sections
‎
2 through
‎
7), which includes for “business purposes” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)/California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA) and similar state laws, as applicable. Our disclosure of certain internet activity and device information with third parties through cookies, pixels and other tracking technologies is considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information, or processing for purposes of “targeted advertising” as such terms are defined under relevant US State Privacy laws, for more information please visit our
Cookie Policy
. We may disclose personal data to third parties or allow them to collect personal data from our Services as described in
Section
‎
5
above, if those third parties are our customers (in respect of Client-Owned Data processed on their behalf), or our authorized Service Providers or business partners who have agreed to our contractual limitations as to their retention, use, and disclosure of such personal data, or if you integrate the services of third parties with our Services, or direct us to disclose your personal data to third parties, or as otherwise described in
Section 5
above. You may also designate an authorized agent, in writing or through a power of attorney, to request to exercise your privacy rights on your behalf. The authorized agent may submit a request to exercise these rights by emailing us. Note that we will not discriminate against you by withholding our Services from you or providing a lower quality of service to you for requesting to exercise your rights under the law.
If you have any questions or would like to exercise your rights under the CCPA/CPRA, you can contact
privacy@yotpo.com
or our DPO at
dpo@yotpo.com
.
External Links
: While our Services may contain links to other websites or services, we are not responsible for their privacy practices. We encourage you to pay attention when you leave our Services for the website or application of such third parties, and to read the privacy policies of each and every website and service you visit. This Privacy Policy applies only to our Services.
Nothing in this policy contradicts the following statement:
with respect to Yotpo’s products, Yotpo does not collect, retain or disclose any data regarding a particular user or device (including IP addresses and user identifiers) on sites or apps not owned by Yotpo except through the p.yotpo.com subdomain, which supports the functional and analytic capabilities of our products.
Our Services are not designed to attract children under the age of 16
: We do not knowingly collect personal data from children and do not wish to do so. If we learn that a person under the age of 16 is using the Services, we will attempt to prohibit and block such use and will make our best efforts to promptly delete any personal data stored with us with regard to such child. If you believe that we might have any such data, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@yotpo.com
.
Data Protection Officer
: Yotpo has appointed PrivacyTeam Ltd. as our Data Protection Officer, for monitoring and advising on Yotpo’s ongoing privacy compliance and serving as a point of contact on privacy matters for data subjects and supervisory authorities. If you have any comments or questions regarding our Privacy Policy, if you have any concerns regarding your Privacy or if you wish to make a complaint about how your personal data is being processed by Yotpo, you can contact
privacy@yotpo.com
or our DPO at
dpo@yotpo.com
.
EU Representative
: SMSBump Ltd., a Yotpo company situated in Bulgaria, has been designated as Yotpo’s representative in the European Union for data protection matters pursuant to Article 27 of the GDPR. SMSBump may be contacted on matters related to the processing of personal data of individuals in the EU. To make such an inquiry, please send an email to
privacy@yotpo.com
.
UK Representative
: Yotpo UK Limited has been designated as Yotpo’s representative in the United Kingdom for data protection matters pursuant to Article 27 of the UK GDPR. Yotpo UK may be contacted only on matters related to the processing of personal data of individuals in the UK. To make such an inquiry, please send an email to
privacy@yotpo.com
.
Questions, concerns or complaints
: If you have any comments or questions regarding our Privacy Policy, or if you have any concerns regarding your personal data held with us, please contact us at:
privacy@yotpo.com
.
30 min demo
Don't postpone your growth
Fill out the form today and discover how Yotpo can elevate your retention game in a quick demo.
This will take just a moment…
We're finding the right person on our team to help your brand!
“Yotpo is a fundamental part of our recommended tech stack.”
Laura Doonin,
Commercial Director
YOTPO POWERS THE WORLD'S FASTEST-GROWING BRANDS
30 min demo
Don't postpone your growth
Join a free demo, personalized to fit your needs
Get the best pricing plan to maximize your growth
See how Yotpo's multi-solutions can boost sales
Watch our platform in action & the impact it makes
30K+
Growing brands trust Yotpo
Sub-policy 5
https://www.omnisend.com/privacy:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Cookiebot
2
Learn more about this provider
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
CookieConsent
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Easypolls
4
Learn more about this provider
AWSALB
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBCORS
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTG
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTGCORS
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
Google
1
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
Hubspot
2
Learn more about this provider
_cfuvid [x2]
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Loom
4
Learn more about this provider
awc.taskSessions
This cookie is necessary for the login function on the website.
awc.taskSessionsInit
This cookie is necessary for the login function on the website.
__awc_tld_test__ [x2]
Necessary for the general functionality of the website.
VWO
3
Learn more about this provider
l.gif
This cookie is used by the website’s operator in context with multi-variate testing. This is a tool used to combine or change content on the website. This allows the website to find the best variation/edition of the site.
v.gif
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
vwoSn
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
cdn.mxpnl.com
1
__mp_opt_in_out_#
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
datawrapper.dwcdn.net
2
#/datawrapper.gif [x2]
Counts the total number of views for embedded visualizations.
hsadspixel.net
hs-banner.com
hubspotusercontent-na1.net
t.co
15
__cf_bm [x15]
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
mountain.com
1
guid
Preserves users states across page requests.
px.mountain.com
1
tt
Registers the website's speed and performance. This function can be used in context with statistics and load-balancing.
www.omnisend.com
2
cf_chl_rc_m
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
PHPSESSID
Preserves user session state across page requests.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
Hubspot
1
Learn more about this provider
messagesUtk
Stores a unique ID string for each chat-box session. This allows the website-support to see previous issues and reconnect with the previous supporter.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
lidc
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
Loom
2
Learn more about this provider
loom_anon_comment
This cookie stores information for the widget settings on the website.
__Host-psifi.analyticsTraceV2
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
www.omnisend.com
1
wistia-video-progress-#
Contains a timestamp for the website’s video-content. This allows the user to resume watching without having to start over, if the user leaves the video or website.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Google
2
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
_ga_#
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
Hotjar
5
Learn more about this provider
hjActiveViewportIds
This cookie contains an ID string on the current session. This contains non-personal information on what subpages the visitor enters – this information is used to optimize the visitor's experience.
hjViewportId
Saves the user's screen size in order to adjust the size of images on the website.
_hjSession_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_hjSessionUser_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_hjTLDTest
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
Hubspot
4
Learn more about this provider
__hssc
Identifies if the cookie data needs to be updated in the visitor's browser.
__hssrc
Used to recognise the visitor's browser upon reentry on the website.
__hstc
Sets a unique ID for the session. This allows the website to obtain data on visitor behaviour for statistical purposes.
hubspotutk
Sets a unique ID for the session. This allows the website to obtain data on visitor behaviour for statistical purposes.
Loom
7
Learn more about this provider
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to count how many times a website has been visited by different visitors - this is done by assigning the visitor an ID, so the visitor does not get registered twice.
sentryReplaySession
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
viewer_session_data
Used in connection with End User Experience Monitoring (EUEM). The cookie collects information on application/device performance, which allows support/website staff to optimize their products and services.
ajs_anonymous_id [x2]
This cookie is used to identify a specific visitor - this information is used to identify the number of specific visitors on a website.
__Host-psifi.analyticsTrace
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
dd_cookie_test_#
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
SalesLoft
2
Learn more about this provider
sliguid
Contains an visitor ID - This is used to track visitors' navigation and interaction on the website for internal website-optimization.
slirequested
Contains an visitor ID - This is used to track visitors' navigation and interaction on the website for internal website-optimization.
Twitter Inc.
1
Learn more about this provider
personalization_id
This cookie is set by Twitter - The cookie allows the visitor to share content from the website onto their Twitter profile.
VWO
10
Learn more about this provider
_vis_opt_exp_#_combi
Used by Visual Website Optimizer to ensure that the same user interface variant is displayed for each visit, if the user is participating in a design experiment.
_vis_opt_exp_#_exclude
Used by Visual Website Optimizer to exclude the user from a design experiment.
_vis_opt_s
Used by Visual Website Optimizer to determine if the visitor is participating in a design experiment.
_vis_opt_test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
_vwo_ds
Collects data on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded with the purpose of generating reports for optimising the website content.
_vwo_referrer
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
_vwo_sn
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_vwo_uuid
Used by Visual Website Optimizer to ensure that the same user interface variant is displayed for each visit, if the user is participating in a design experiment.
_vwo_uuid_v2
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
vwo_apm_sent
Pending
www.omnisend.com
1
wistia
Used by the website to track the visitor's use of video-content - The cookie roots from Wistia, which provides video-software to websites.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
Cloudflare
1
Learn more about this provider
ytidb::LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
Easypolls
1
Learn more about this provider
fbssls_#
Collects data on the visitor’s use of the comment system on the website, and what blogs/articles the visitor has read. This can be used for marketing purposes.
Google
2
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
NID
Registers a unique ID that identifies a returning user's device. The ID is used for targeted ads.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
Hubspot
1
Learn more about this provider
__ptq.gif
Sends data to the marketing platform Hubspot about the visitor's device and behaviour. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
Intercom
1
Learn more about this provider
gtm_id
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
Liveintent
4
Learn more about this provider
_li_duid
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
lidid
Collects data on visitors' behaviour and interaction - This is used to make advertisement on the website more relevant. The cookie also allows the website to detect any referrals from other websites.
_lc2_fpi
Registers user behaviour and navigation on the website, and any interaction with active campaigns. This is used for optimizing advertisement and for efficient retargeting.
_li_dcdm_c
Registers user behaviour and navigation on the website, and any interaction with active campaigns. This is used for optimizing advertisement and for efficient retargeting.
Loom
5
Learn more about this provider
ajs_user_id
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
__tld__ [x2]
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
ajs_user_id
This cookie is used to collect data on the visitor's behavior on the website - this information can be used to assign the visitor to a visitor segment, based on common preferences.
loom_referral_video
Used to detect referrals in relation to website's embedded video-player.
Microsoft
8
Learn more about this provider
_uetsid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
_uetsid_exp
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
_uetvid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
_uetvid_exp
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
MSPTC
This cookie registers data on the visitor. The information is used to optimize advertisement relevance.
MUID
Used widely by Microsoft as a unique user ID. The cookie enables user tracking by synchronising the ID across many Microsoft domains.
_uetsid
Collects data on visitor behaviour from multiple websites, in order to present more relevant advertisement - This also allows the website to limit the number of times that they are shown the same advertisement.
_uetvid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
SalesLoft
1
Learn more about this provider
slireg
Registers user behaviour and navigation on the website, and any interaction with active campaigns. This is used for optimizing advertisement and for efficient retargeting.
Salesloft
1
Learn more about this provider
site_identity
Collects data on user behaviour and interaction in order to optimize the website and make advertisement on the website more relevant.
Twitter Inc.
7
Learn more about this provider
1/i/adsct [x2]
Collects data on user behaviour and interaction in order to optimize the website and make advertisement on the website more relevant.
muc_ads
Collects data on user behaviour and interaction in order to optimize the website and make advertisement on the website more relevant.
guest_id
Collects data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and which pages have been loaded, with the purpose of personalising and improving the Twitter service.
guest_id_ads
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
guest_id_marketing
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
i/jot/embeds
Sets a unique ID for the visitor, that allows third party advertisers to target the visitor with relevant advertisement. This pairing service is provided by third party advertisement hubs, which facilitates real-time bidding for advertisers.
YouTube
21
Learn more about this provider
#-#
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Pending
iU5q-!O9@$
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
LogsDatabaseV2:V#||LogsRequestsStore
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
nextId
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
remote_sid
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
requests
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
ServiceWorkerLogsDatabase#SWHealthLog
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
TESTCOOKIESENABLED
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Tries to estimate the users' bandwidth on pages with integrated YouTube videos.
YSC
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
yt.innertube::nextId
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
YtIdbMeta#databases
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
yt-remote-cast-available
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-cast-installed
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-connected-devices
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-device-id
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-fast-check-period
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-app
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-name
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
cdn.mxpnl.com
2
mp_#_mixpanel [x2]
Pending
Unclassified
12
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
Liveintent
1
Learn more about this provider
_lc2_fpi_js
Pending
Loom
4
Learn more about this provider
awc.session.expiry
Pending
awc.session.id
Pending
awc.tab.id
Pending
analytics-web-client#analytics-resilience
Pending
opps-api.getwarmly.com
1
A/N{39}
Pending
opps-widget.getwarmly.com
4
ClientSessionStore
Pending
MediaStore-client
Pending
warmly_fingerprint
Pending
WidgetStore
Pending
www.chatbase.co
2
message_bubbles_have_been_shown
Pending
chatbase_anon_id
Pending
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/18/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please state your consent ID and date when you contact us regarding your consent.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Deny
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all
Features
Pricing
Migration
Integrations
Resources
Start free
Request demo
Log in
Main meniu
CHANNELS
Email marketing
Build better relationships with customers
SMS
Text your customers around the world
Web push notifications
Instantly retarget your customers
Product reviews
Email & SMS automations to ask your customers for reviews.
GET YOUR SALES ROLLING
1
Build your list
2
Automate
3
Send campaigns
shortcuts
Omnisend AI
All features
Segmentation
Reporting
Channels
Support
Start free
Request demo
Log in
Main meniu
Explore integrations
With over 130+ pre-built integrations and flexible APIs, you can easily centralize data from across your tech stack
App market
Make the most out of your data and unlock powerful growth marketing possibilities  with these other top marketing tools.
API docs
Build any custom integration with our open, flexible APIs that are simple to use and implement.
OMNISEND BUILT FOR
OFFER
APPS FOR
Check out apps that have been stealing all the spotlight.
Email capture
Loyalty & rewards
Advertising
Email builder
Subscriptions
Start free
Request demo
Log in
Main meniu
LEARN & GROW YOUR BUSINESS
Blog
Email and SMS marketing insights, ecommerce resources, and the latest Omnisend news
Webinars
Expert-led sessions covering email, SMS, and ecommerce marketing strategies.
Omnisend academy
Educational video and live training to help you make the most out of Omnisend.
Marketing Playbook (free edition)
Successful email & SMS strategies that you can copy for your own store.
DOWNLOADS AND GOODIES
Ebooks
Reports
Tools hub
Template gallery
Success Stories
NEED HELP?
Help center
Contact Us
Product updates
Start free
Request demo
Log in
Je ne pense pas que la qualité du site Web sera bonne
Vous pouvez parcourir notre site Internet en français, ou continuer en anglais, en cliquant ci-dessous. Nous vous demanderons également de répondre à quelques questions pour nous aider à améliorer votre expérience.
Continue in english
Continuer en français
Why did you choose English?
We’d like to understand why the local language is not a good fit for you.
I prefer browsing in English
I’m a native English speaker
I want the full experience
I don’t think the website quality will be good
Why are you switching back to English?
We’d like to understand why the local language was not a good fit for you.
The French was poorly translated
I needed more information
I prefer browsing in English
I don’t think the website quality will be good
Vous quittez les pages de notre site web traduites en français
Comment trouvez-vous notre site en français ?
Je voudrais plus de pages en français
Il était difficile à comprendre en français
J'ai adoré !
Je préfère naviguer en anglais
Je veux rester sur le site traduit en français
Privacy Policy
OMNISEND
PRIVACY POLICY
Effective starting: 27.05.2022
Last revised:  20.01.2023
GENERAL PROVISIONS
We care about your privacy and the security of your personal data (“Personal Data”), so we have developed this privacy policy (the “Privacy Policy”), which explains how we process and protect your Personal Data, what your rights we ensure, and provides other information about the processing of your Personal Data.
In this Privacy Policy, the term “Personal Data” means any information or set of information by which we may directly or indirectly identify you, such as your name, email address, telephone number, etc.
We process Personal Data in accordance with the provisions of the General Data Protection Regulation No. 2016/679 (EU) (the “GDPR”) and the requirements of the legal acts of the Republic of Lithuania, as well as the instructions of the authorities.
The Privacy Policy applies when you use our tools and resources, available at
https://app.omnisend.com
(the “Platform”), you request and use information, services or functionalities available on the Platform (the “Services“), you act as a marketing agency, freelancer or affiliate partner and use specific services accessible via the partner portal (the “Partners Portal”) (the “Partners Portal Services”), visit our website, available at
https://www.omnisend.com/
, and our blog available at
https://blog.omnisend.com/
(jointly the “Website”), subscribe for our newsletters or visit our social network accounts on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram and YouTube (the “Social Accounts”), contact us by e-mail, phone, other electronic communication means, apply for a job, etc.
We may use specific software to register certain customers or partners (e.g. we may use affiliate management software for registering and managing our Affiliate partners). We want to inform you that our customers or partners will be made aware that we use such platforms upon registration and that such platforms have separate privacy policies.
In this Privacy Policy a representative of the legal person, which registers to the Platform, Partners Portal, uses the Partners Portal Services or Services shall be called a “Customer”. Persons using the Website, Social Accounts, or contacting us shall be referred to as “you” (this definition also applies to the Customer when the specific Section of the Privacy Policy applies to both the Customer and other Data Subjects).
The Platform, Partners Portal, Website and Social Accounts may contain links to external websites, such as our partner websites, websites promoting our Services. When you follow links to any of these websites, please note that these sites and the services accessed through them have their own separate privacy policies and that we assume no responsibility or liability for this policy or for the collection of Personal Data on these sites. Before submitting Personal Data there or using related services, it is important to review their privacy policy.
By using the Services, Partners Portal Services, Platform, Partners Portal, Website or Social Accounts, subscribing to our newsletters, or contacting or addressing us on any other issues, you are agreeing to the terms of this Privacy Policy and the purposes, methods, and procedures for the use of your Personal Data specified therein. If you do not agree with the Privacy Policy, you may
not
use our Services or otherwise interact with us.
Capitalized definitions that are not specifically defined in this Privacy Policy shall have the meanings set out in the Omnisend Terms and Conditions (the “Terms”), other documentation available at the Platform and Website and the GDPR.
This Privacy Policy is subject to change, so please visit the Website from time to time and read the latest version of the Privacy Policy. Continued use of the Services, Partners Portal Services, Platform, Partners Portal, Website or Social Accounts will, to the greatest extent permitted by applicable law, be considered as consent to any updates to the Privacy Policy which may be made, from time to time.
WHO ARE WE?
We are Omnisend and we act as a group of private limited liability companies, in most cases acting as joint Controllers of your Personal Data (the “Omnisend”, “Company” or “we”). This Privacy Policy applies to all the legal entities (the “Affiliates”) listed below:
Name of the Company
UAB Omnisend
Omnisend, LLC.
Omnisend, Ltd.
Legal entity code:
302530363
6567194
EIN 301200039
Address:
Verkių g. 25C-1, LT-08223 Vilnius, Republic of Lithuania.
Address – Unit A3, Gateway Tower, 32 Western Gateway, London, E16 1YL
England
1401 Sam Rittenberg Blvd Suite 2, Charleston, SC 29407, United States
Contact details
E-mail: info@omnisend.com
Contacts of the DPO.
E-mail:info@omnisend.com
Address: Verkių g. 25C-1, LT-08223 Vilnius, Republic of Lithuania
We act as a Personal Data Controller in offering and providing Services, Partners Portal Services, Platform and the Partners Portal, managing the Website and Social Accounts, performing the Companies’ day-to-day operations, complying with legal requirements, etc.
When we receive and process Personal Data on behalf of our Customers that use our Services and the Platform, we conduct such processing only in accordance with the terms set forth in the Data Processing Agreement (the “DPA”) concluded between us and the Customer. In such scenario we act as a Personal Data Processor for our Customers, as it is stipulated in Article 28 of GDPR.
We also offer various integrations, i.e. technical solutions, such as plug-ins, that allow you to integrate our Services on other platforms (e.g. eCommerce platforms, social networks, etc.). These integrations help you to analyze the flow of your customers (by providing anonymized statistical data), etc. You can see a list of integrations we offer here. For more information on how providers of those integrations process Personal Data please see their own privacy policies.
When offering Partners Portal Services, we act as a Sub-Processor of Personal Data and we only subprocess Personal Data on behalf of the Customer solely according to the agreement signed between Omnisend and the delegating Customer who uses Partners Portal Services, for example, to help its clients to perform marketing campaigns and manage their accounts on the Platform. In such a scenario, again, we only process Personal Data on behalf of our Customer and strictly according to the DPA signed between us and such Customer. Our representatives, who are bound by a confidentiality agreement, may also log into such Partners Portal Services account to help them with the issues they face while using Partners Portal Services, adjust their account settings, etc. We assure you that such logins wouldn’t be performed without prior notice or regularly.
WHAT PERSONAL DATA DO WE PROCESS?
We process your Personal Data which we may obtain in the following ways:
3.1 When you provide Personal Data to us, for example, when you register to and use the Platform, Partners Portal, Services, Partners Portal Services, contact us, subscribe to our newsletter, apply for a job position offered by us, etc.;
3.2 When we collect your Personal Data when you use our Services, Partners Portal Services, Platform, Partners Portal, Website, Social Accounts, such as usage history, your IP address, device information, transaction information, general location, cookies, preferences, open URL links, etc.;
3.3 When we receive Personal Data from other parties, for example, when we receive information from public registers, state or local government institutions or bodies, our partners, other third parties, such as payment institutions, about payments made, etc.;
3.4 When your Personal Data, with your consent, is provided to us by other persons, including companies using our Services, for example, when such companies indicate your contacts, refer to you as an authorized person, etc.
We process Personal Data to offer and provide Services, Partners Portal Services, Platform and Partners Portal, to fulfil our contractual obligations, as well as pursuing our or third parties’ legitimate interest, in compliance with legal regulations or obligations.
The person providing Personal Data to us is responsible for the correctness, completeness, and relevance of such Personal Data, as well as for the consent of the person whose data is provided to submit his/her/their Personal Data to us. We may ask you to confirm that the person has the right to provide us with Personal Data (for example, by filling in service order or registration forms). If necessary (e. g. a person inquires to us about receiving their Personal Data), we will indicate the provider of such Personal Data.
We process your Personal Data for the following purposes and under the following conditions:
Purpose of the processing of Personal Data
Personal Data being processed
Personal Data processing period
Legal basis for the processing of Personal Data
Registration to and use of the Platform, user identification, provision of the Services.
Name, surname, email, phone number, username, password, used email or marketing automation software, platform used for online store, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, billing name and address, Services and account usage history and data, marketing campaigns data, content associated with Services and account information about the Services ordered and used and changes therein.
During the period of use of the account and 5 years after the last login to the account.
Where the Personal data is processed based on consent during the validity term of the consent and in case of revocation of the consent – until the expiry of the consent.
Data processing is necessary for the conclusion and performance of the contract (Article 6(1)(b) GDPR).
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Agency/freelancer registration to and use of the Partners Portal Services, identification, provision of the Partners Portal Services.
Name, surname, email, phone number, username, password, workplace and job information, partner client’s data, location data, Partners Portal Services and account usage history, marketing campaigns data, content associated with Services and account, other information about the Partner.
During the period of use of the account and 5 years after the last login to the account.
Where the Personal data is processed based on consent during the validity term of the consent and in case of revocation of the consent – until the expiry of the consent.
Data processing is necessary for the conclusion and performance of the contract (Article 6(1)(b) GDPR).
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Affiliate partner registration to and use of the affiliate management software, identification of the Affiliate partner, maintenance of the business relations and communication with the Affiliate partner.
Name, surname, email, phone number, username, password, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, self-employment certificate data, payments data, billing name and address, affiliate link sharing data, affiliate link analytical data, marketing campaigns data, content associated with account.
During the period of use of the account and 5 years after the last login to the account.
Where the Personal data is processed based on consent during the validity term of the consent and in case of revocation of the consent – until the expiry of the consent.
Data processing is necessary for the conclusion and performance of the contract (Article 6(1)(b) GDPR).
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Services, Partners Portal Services quality management and services related communication.
Name, surname, email, phone number, username, password, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, subscribed Services or Partners Portal Services, information needed to address quality issues, content of the request and response to the request.
During the administration of the question and 5 years after the end of the administration of the question or the last contact.
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Conclusion and execution of contracts necessary for the Omnisend’s activities, other internal management.
Name, surname, phone number, e-mail, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, self-employment certificate data, other data required for cooperation.
During the period of provision of Services/cooperation and 5 years after the end of provision of Services/cooperation unless a longer storage period is mandatory in accordance with the Index of General Document Storage Periods approved by order No. V-100 of the Chief Archivist of the Republic of Lithuania of 9 March 2011.
Data processing is necessary for the conclusion and performance of the contract (Article 6(1)(b) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Execution of financial operations, accounting, debt management.
Name, surname, e-mail, phone number, address, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, account number, credit institution, payment information, debt information, data transferred by the company collecting the contributions and confirmations of payments.
According to the regulatory legal acts, as well as in accordance with the Index of General Document Storage Periods approved by order No. V-100 of the Chief Archivist of the Republic of Lithuania of 9 March 2011.
When the data does not fall within the above-mentioned storage area – the period of validity of the contract/cooperation between the parties and 10 years after the end of the contract/relationship (last contact).
Data processing is necessary for the conclusion and performance of the contract (Article 6(1)(b) GDPR).
Data processing is necessary to fulfill a legal obligation imposed on the data controller (Article 6(1)(c) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Evaluation and selection of candidates for the offered job.
Name, surname, e-mail, phone number, address, education and activity data, content of the CV, other information required for the selection/evaluation of the candidate or provided by the candidate.
During the recruitment campaign period and 3 months after the selection if the candidate’s consent to the retention of data after the selection has been obtained.
When data are received not for a specific recruitment campaign, they shall be stored for 3 months after the date of their receipt.
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Management of electronic information channels (Platform, Partners Portal, Social Accounts, Website), ensuring functionality and security and improving quality.
IP address, data collected with the help of cookies and settings, browser used, date and time of login, mobile device model and manufacturer, mobile device operating system (iOS, Android), password usage information.
Data collected through the integration of Social Accounts.
Website, Platform and Partners Portal data are stored as described in the section of this Privacy Policy “How Do We Use Analytical Data, Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies”.
Website, Platform and Partners Portal data that is not included in the cookie information is stored for a maximum of 1 year from the date of collection, unless the person revokes his/her consent (when the data are processed on the basis of consent.
Information in Social Accounts is stored according to the conditions set by the owner of this network.
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR);
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Sending news, conducting surveys, direct marketing, advertising campaigns.
Name, e-mail address, phone number, the data requested in the survey announcement/questionnaire, marketing, advertising campaign analytics.
Data are processed for 5 years from the receipt of consent.
Consent of the data subject to the processing of such data (Article 6(1)(a) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Settlement of out-of-court or judicial disputes and claims.
Name, surname, workplace address, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, phone number, e-mail, the content of the claim or other similar document, information/documents related to the dispute/claim.
The entire period of the dispute/claim and 3 years after the end of the out-of-court dispute/claim resolution and 10 years after the end of judicial proceedings.
Data processing is necessary to fulfill a legal obligation imposed on the data controller (Article 6(1)(c) GDPR).
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Platform, Services, Partners Portal and Partners Portal Services personalization and quality assurance, protection of our IP and other rights.
Name, surname, email, phone number, username, password, workplace and job information, position, relationship with the represented legal entity, Platform, Partners Portal, Partners Portal Services and Services usage data.
Data are stored for a maximum of 1 year from the date of collection.
Legitimate interests of the data controller or a third party (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR).
You have the right to refuse or withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data at any time when these are processed based on your consent.
In Social Accounts we can share information about ourselves, our content, events, news, surveys, as well information about the employees we are looking for. Social accounts users are also subject to the privacy policies of the social networks owners. When you contact us on Social Accounts, depending on the privacy settings you choose, we may see certain user account information such as profile first name, surname, image, sex, e-mail address, location, etc. (the list is not exhaustive). If a user posts information by communicating with us on our Social Accounts (e. g. posts a comment in the comments section of our Social Account or posts a message on our Social Account profile), depending on the privacy settings chosen, the posted information may be made public (for example, visible on our Social Account to other users).
In some cases, we may send messages related to the ordering or provision of our Services or Partners Platform Services through the contact data provided by you, for example, to inform you about the confirmation of the order, the expiration date of the ordered Services, temporary or permanent changes to the Services, including, but not limited to, planned outages, new features offered, version updates, point releases, major releases, abuse warnings, and changes to our Terms, Privacy Policy and other documents and agreements. Such communications are necessary for the proper provision of our contractual obligations and Services and are not considered marketing communications.
You have the right to change and update your information provided to us by changing it on the Platform or by contacting us. In some cases, we need to have accurate and up-to-date information about you, so we may ask you to periodically confirm that the information we have about you is correct.
We assure you that Omnisend does not share, sell, rent, or trade any Personal Data with third parties for their marketing or commercial purposes.
We use Stripe as a payment intermediary service to receive payments and to manage credit card processing. Stripe is not permitted to store, retain, or use billing Information except for the sole purpose of credit card processing on our behalf. For more information about the processing of your payment data, please refer to the privacy policy of the Stripe.
When providing our Services or Partners Portal Services, we may, in certain cases, apply automated data decision-making, for example to clarify your needs and compliance with the requirements. Automated decision-making refers to the processing of Personal Data using, for example, a software code or algorithm that does not require human intervention. We regularly review the criteria and models used in automated decision-making to ensure their integrity, efficiency, and impartiality. We do not use profiling-based automated decision-making processes that may have legal consequences or similarly have a significant impact on the rights or freedoms of Data Subjects. Nevertheless, you have the right to request human intervention to express your opinion or object to the results of an automated decision-making, in which case your situation will be assessed by our specialist.
To protect children’s rights, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data from Data Subjects under the age of eighteen (18) that can be used to specifically identify them, and we do not permit Data Subjects under the age of eighteen (18) to use any of Omnisend’s Services. If you believe we might have any information from or about underage children, please contact us at privacy@omnisend.com.
We may, in certain cases, process Personal Data longer than indicated in this Privacy Policy, e. g. when we are required to do so by law, when we are engaged in litigation, arbitration, pre-trial investigation, etc. The Company assures that in such cases your Personal Data will be deleted immediately as soon as it becomes unnecessary for such purposes.
HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA AND WHAT PRINCIPLES DO WE KEEP?
We collect and process only such Personal Data as it is necessary to achieve the Personal Data processing purposes we have specified.
When processing your Personal Data:
4.1. We comply with the requirements of current and applicable legislation, including the GDPR;
4.2. We process your Personal Data in a lawful, fair, and transparent manner;
4.3. We collect your Personal Data for specified, clearly defined and legitimate purposes and do not process them in a way incompatible with those purposes, except to the extent permitted by law;
4.4. We take all reasonable steps to ensure that Personal Data that is inaccurate or incomplete, in accordance with the purposes for which they are processed, would be rectified, supplemented, suspended, or destroyed without delay;
4.5. We hold them in such a form that your identity can be established for no longer than is necessary for the purposes for which the Personal Data are processed;
4.6. We do not provide Personal Data to third parties or disclose them, other than as set forth in the Privacy Policy or applicable law;
4.7. We ensure that your Personal Data is processed securely, we ensure technical and organizational security measures, as well as we provide access to Personal Data only to those of our employees who need such access due to their work functions.
5.TO WHOM AND WHEN DO WE TRANSFER YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
We will only transfer your Personal Data as described in this Privacy Policy.
We may transfer your Personal Data to:
5.1. Our business partners, suppliers, sub-contractors, or agents who perform services for it, or consultants such as auditors, lawyers, tax advisors, analytics and search engine providers that assist us in the improvement and optimization of the Platform, etc., as well as the Personal Data Processors we use, such as ancillary service providers, IT companies, advertising and marketing companies, accounting companies, etc. We require data processors to store, process and treat Personal Data as responsibly as we do and only in accordance with our instructions. The list of our partners and data processors is provided to you on demand (you shall ask for this list separately, via the contacts provided in this Privacy Policy). We have such partners and data processors:
5.1.1. State or local government institutions and authorities, law enforcement and pre-trial investigation institutions, courts and other dispute resolution institutions, other persons performing functions assigned by law, in accordance with the procedure provided for by legislation of the Republic of Lithuania. We provide these entities with mandatory information required by law or specified by the entities themselves.
5.2. Other third parties, such as payment institutions, etc.
5.3. If necessary, to companies that intend to buy or would buy the Company’s business or would conduct joint activities with us or would cooperate in another form.
5.4. To Affiliates with whom we are under common corporate control. In case such Affiliate is established outside the EEA we will conduct such Personal Data transfer only following conditions set out in the subsections 5.4.1. – 5.4.5. of the Privacy Policy (e. g. will sign EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission for the transfer of data outside the EEA with such Affiliate).
We normally process Personal Data within the EEA, but in some cases your Personal Data may be transferred outside the EEA. The Company will always take steps to ensure any transfer of such information to entities based outside the EEA is carefully managed to protect your rights and interests by implementing appropriate safeguards to protect Personal Data.
Your Personal Data will only be transferred outside the EEA under the following conditions:
5.1. EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission, which ensure the security of transfers of your Personal Data, have been signed with such partners. We use and have incorporated European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses into our DPA.
5.2. The Commission of the European Union has decided on the eligibility of the country in which our partner is established, i.e., an adequate level of security is ensured;
5.3. You have given your consent to the transfer of your Personal Data outside the EEA; or
5.4. A special permit of the State Data Protection Inspectorate of the Republic of Lithuania was obtained to carry out such transfer.
WHAT RIGHTS DO YOU HAVE?
As a data subject, you have the following rights regarding your Personal Data:
6.1. To know (to be informed) about the processing of your Personal Data (right to know);
6.2. To access your Personal Data and the way they are processed (right of access);
6.3. To request the correction or, depending on the purposes of the processing of Personal Data, supplementation of incomplete Personal Data (right to rectification);
6.4. To request the erasure of your Personal Data or the suspension of your Personal Data processing activities (excluding storage) (right to erase and right to “be forgotten”);
6.5.To request us to restrict the processing of Personal Data for one of the legitimate reasons (right to restrict);
6.6.The right to transfer data (right to transfer). This right may be exercised only if there are grounds for its exercise and appropriate technical measures to ensure that the transfer of the requested Personal Data does not pose a risk of security breach to the data of other Data Subjects;
6.7.The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data when we process Personal Data based on a legitimate interest of the Company or a third party, including profiling. If you object, we will only be able to further process your Personal Data for compelling legitimate reasons that take precedence over your interests, rights, and freedoms, or to make, enforce or defend legal claims;
6.8. To revoke your consent to the processing of your Personal Data when this data are processed or intended to be processed for direct marketing purposes, including profiling as far as such direct marketing is concerned (based on the Personal Data you provide, profiling may be carried out for direct marketing purposes to offer you individually tailored solutions and proposals. You can revoke your consent to the processing of Personal Data by automated processing, including profiling, or object to it at any time).
If you do not want your Personal Data to be processed for direct marketing purposes, for the purposes of direct marketing, competitions, the organization of surveys, including profiling, you can refuse such processing without giving reasons for refusal (disagreement), by writing an email to privacy@omnisend.com, or in another way specified in the message provided to you (for example, by clicking on the link in the newsletter).
We may refuse to exercise your rights listed above, except for refusal to process your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes, competitions or in other cases when Personal Data is processed with your consent, when your request is allowed to us not to comply with the provision of the GDPR, or when, in cases provided for by law, it is necessary to ensure the prevention, investigation and detection of crimes, violations of official or professional ethics, as well as the protection of the rights and freedoms of the Data Subject, us and other persons.
You can exercise part of your rights as a Data Subject by changing the user account settings in the Platform or Partners Portal and the information contained therein. You may submit any request or instruction related to the processing of Personal Data to us in writing by e-mail privacy@omnisend.com. When submitting such a request, we may ask you to fill in the necessary forms, as well as provide an identification document or other information that will help us to verify your identity, to better understand the content of your request. Upon request by e-mail, depending on its content, we may ask you to come to us or submit a written request.
Upon receipt of your request or instruction regarding the processing of Personal Data, no later than within 1 month from the date of the request, we will provide a response and perform the actions specified in the request or inform you why we refuse to perform them. If necessary, the specified period may be extended by a further 2 months, considering the complexity and number of requests. In such a case, within 1 month from the date of receipt of the request, we will inform you of such extension.
If Personal Data is deleted upon your request, we will only store copies of information that are necessary to protect our legitimate interests and those of others, to comply with the obligations of state institutions, to resolve disputes, to recognize interference or to comply with any agreements you have entered with us.
WILL WE SEND YOU NEWS?
With your consent, we may use your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes to provide you with newsletters, offers and information about our Services, as well as to inquire about the quality of our Services.
The above content can be sent by e-mail, messages to the phone number specified by you, as well as messages in your account in the Platform or Partners Portal. Your contacts may be transferred to our partners who provide us with news sending or quality assessment services.
After sending such content, we can collect information about the people who received it, for example, which message people opened, what links they clicked on, etc. Such information is collected to offer you relevant and more tailored news and content.
Even if you have given your consent to the processing of Personal Data for direct marketing purposes, you can easily withdraw this consent for all or part of the Personal Data processing activities at any time. To do this, you can:
7.1. notify us of your withdrawal in the manner specified in the provided message (e. g. by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in the newsletter, etc.); or
7.2. send us a notification to the e-mail address specified in this Privacy Policy. If you so request withdrawal of consent, we may ask you to verify your identity.
If you withdraw your consent, we will try to stop sending such content to you immediately.
Withdrawal of consent does not automatically oblige us to destroy your Personal Data or provide you with information about the Personal Data processed by us, therefore, for these actions you should submit a separate request.
To show you more relevant personalized advertising, our advertising partners use various mobile and online cookies. Personalized advertising will only be shown to you with your consent. Advertising personalization cookies are used to measure a group, activate contextual advertising, and/or target campaigns. If you are authorized to use cookies, a user profile with an alias will be generated, but it will not be possible to identify the person. We do not control these third-party monitoring technologies and their use. Third-party cookies are governed by the privacy policies of third parties. You can opt out of personalized cookies by changing your browser settings or by other means that are listed in Section 9 of the Privacy Policy.
HOW WE PROTECT YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
Your Personal Data are processed responsibly, securely and are protected from loss, unauthorized use, and alteration. We have put in place physical and technical measures to protect the information we collect from an accidental or unlawful destruction, damage, alteration, loss, disclosure, as well as from any other unlawful processing. Security measures for Personal Data shall be determined considering the risks arising from the processing of Personal Data.
Our employees are under a written obligation not to disclose or distribute your Personal Data to third parties, unauthorized persons.
We will strive not to store outdated and irrelevant Personal Data, therefore, when updated (e. g. after adjusting or changing information in your account, etc.), the only relevant information is stored. Historical information is stored, if necessary, following the law or during our business activities.
HOW WE USE COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES?
Cookies are a small text file that stores information (often consisting only of a sequence of numbers and letters that identifies the device but may also contain other information) that is used in the browser of the device (computer, tablet, mobile phone, etc.) (e. g. Google Chrome, Internet Explorer, Firefox, Mozilla, Opera, etc.) according to its settings and stored on the device’s hard drive. In our Privacy Policy, we use the term “cookies” to describe cookies and other similar technologies, such as Pixel Tags, Web Beacons, Network Data Collectors. The use of cookies ensures better and more efficient operation of the Platform, Partners Portal, and the Website.
We use cookies to analyze information flows and user behavior, promote trust and ensure security, as well as to ensure the proper functioning of the Platform, Partners Portal, and the Website, improve it, remember your chosen settings to personalize the content displayed to you, link the Website, Platform and Partners Portal to Social Accounts.
You can choose whether you want to accept cookies. If you do not agree to cookies being stored in the browser or memory of your device, you can mark it in the cookie consent bar, change the settings of the browser you are using, and disable cookies (all at once or one at a time, or in groups) or follow the official instructions for the device. Please note that in some cases, the refusal of cookies may slow down browsing speed, limit the functioning of certain functions of the Platform, Partners Portal or the Website, or block access to the afore-mentioned channels. Further information on the refusal of cookies can be found at the www.AllAboutCookies.org or
https://www.google.com/privacy_ads.html
.
We may use mandatory cookies that are necessary for the operation of the Platform, Partners Portal and the Website, analytical cookies, functional cookies, which are intended to analyze the visitors of the Platform, Partners Portal, and the Website, memorize users’ preferences, and apply them to the Platform, Partners Portal or Website, performance cookies, third-party cookies used by third parties, advertising cookies, which are intended to show you personalized and general advertising.
We use these Google Inc. tools:
9.1. Google Analytics – which allows you to analyze the use of the Platform, Partners Portal or Website, compile reports, plan and predict the activity of the Platform, Partners Portal or Website. Data collected by Google Analytics is typically stored on a Google Inc. server in the U.S. You can change your browser settings to prevent Google Analytics from analyzing information by changing your browser settings. In this case, you will be entered with an opt-out cookie. However, if you delete all cookies, the opt-out cookie may also be deleted. You can also prevent Google from capturing data created by a cookie based on your use of the Platform or the Website and from processing such data by downloading and installing a browser plug-in from https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=en.
9.2. Google Ads – which allows you to evaluate the use of the Platform, Partners Portal, and the Website in relation to the advertisements displayed, to draw up reports. All this information is anonymous. Data collected by Google Ads is typically stored on a Google server in the U.S. If you don’t want to receive tailor-made advertising and/or want to opt out of Google Inc. cookies, you can turn off Google Inc. advertising settings at the
https://www.google.com/settings/ads
by changing your settings as needed. In this case, an opt-out cookie may be entered for you. However, if you delete all cookies, the opt-out cookie may also be deleted.
9.3. Google Remarketing – allows users to re-receive ads on Google partner network sites. If you don’t want to receive tailor-made advertising and/or want to opt out of Google Inc. cookies, you can turn off Google Inc. advertising settings at the
https://www.google.com/settings/ads
by changing your settings as needed. In this case, an opt-out cookie may be entered for you. However, if you delete all cookies, the opt-out cookie may also be deleted.
Cookies used by us can be found here:
https://www.omnisend.com/cookies/
HOW DO WE PROCESS PERSONAL DATA WHEN WE ACT AS A DATA PROCESSOR?
We act as Data Processor when we provide Services to our Customers (in this case we process their Lists, receive their campaign’s analytical data, etc.). We receive this Personal Data directly from a Customer or collect it during the provision of the Services and process it to properly provide our Services. Data are processed when we administer the Platform, solve tasks related to the proper functioning of the Platform and similar.
The Personal Data processed by us as a Personal Data Processor may, among others, include identification and contact data (name, surname, phone, e-mail, username), data received during the provision of Services (IP address, correspondence, campaign’s analytical data).
We process Personal Data for no longer than the duration of the agreement between us and the Customer to provide Services unless such data should be processed for a longer period to prove the proper provision of Services.
We ensure that data trusted to us by the Customers remain private and confidential. We, however, may scan the content of your campaigns to ensure it complies with the Terms and applicable laws. We need to perform such actions to create blacklists, to develop and test algorithms, heuristics and other methods and tools for detecting violations and to apply those methods and tools to the Services. We will not sell, rent, loan, or invite external access to any data trusted to us. We also undertake not to use the Personal Data trusted to us for any other purposes than those specified in the DPA.
Acting as a Data Processor, we undertake to:
10.1. Process Personal Data in accordance with the DPA and only to the extent necessary for the performance of agreement and the provision of Services under it;
10.2. Immediately inform Customer if we are unable to process Personal Data for any reason;
10.3. Entrust the processing of Personal Data only to authorized persons who have assumed the duty of confidentiality to the extent necessary;
10.4. Upon receipt of a request from the Data Subject, the supervisory authority or any other person to provide the processed Personal Data, transmit such request to the Customer;
10.5. Not to use Personal Data for purposes other than the performance of agreement and DPA, take measures to prevent accidental or unlawful destruction, alteration, disclosure of Personal Data, as well as any other unlawful processing;
10.6. Apply appropriate technical and organizational security measures to protect Personal Data in accordance with the GDPR;
10.7. Taking into account the nature of the Personal Data provided, the manner in which it is provided, to enable the Customer to access, correct, delete, restrict and transfer the Personal Data processed by us;
10.8. considering the nature of the processing of Personal Data, the way it is provided, and the technical and organizational measures applied, at the request of the Customer, to assist:
10.8.1. To fulfill the Customer’s obligation to respond to requests to exercise the rights of the Data Subject to the extent that such rights are applied taking into account the Services provided and the conditions for the processing of Personal Data;
10.8.2. To fulfil specific obligations applicable to the Customer under the GDPR or other laws regulating the protection of Personal Data, such as reporting a Personal Data breach, providing information in the context of a data protection impact assessment and prior consultations.
If, because of an instruction or request submitted by the Customer, we incur additional costs not provided for in agreement between us and the Customer, we will immediately inform the Customer and we may suspend the processing of Personal Data (except storage) until the issue of compensation of additional costs is resolved.
If we notice Personal Data breaches (actions or omissions that may cause or threaten the security of Personal Data), we will immediately inform the Customer in writing, providing the information required by the GDPR.
At the Customer’s request, we will provide the information necessary to prove compliance with the applicable Personal Data processing obligations, as well as allow the Customer to perform audits and inspections on our activities while processing data on Customer’s behalf and cooperate in their performance.
We allow the Customer to carry out a verification related to the processing of Personal Data, which is obligated to be carried out by the supervisory authority in accordance with the Personal Data protection legislation. Verification may be carried out only to the extent defined by law and, in any event, the confidentiality of the information obtained during the inspection must be ensured, unless the law requires such information to be made public. We may ask the Customer to reimburse reasonable costs incurred because of such verification.
Where the processing of Personal Data is not necessary for the performance of our obligations under the agreement or the DPA, or when the contractual relationship between us and the Customer expires, we will destroy or return all Personal Data processed on behalf of the Customer and delete copies of this data, unless otherwise provided for in the applicable laws.
Liabilities of the Customer:
10.1. The Customer ensures that the Personal Data submitted to us for processing is collected and processed lawfully, for legitimate purposes and on the grounds, and the Customer has all necessary consents and the right to transfer Personal Data. The Customer undertakes to properly inform Data Subjects about the processing and transfer of their Personal Data to us. The Customer shall be liable for all damages suffered by Data Subjects due to improper processing of Personal Data by the Customer;
10.2. We do not individually verify the lawfulness of the transfer of such data. If any person indicates that Personal Data transferred to us is collected or processed unlawfully, we will immediately suspend the processing of such Personal Data until the Customer denies these circumstances. The Customer bears all the costs and negative consequences associated with such denial, including delays in the supply of Services. We will not be liable for such consequences;
10.3. The Customer undertakes to provide the necessary and lawful instructions regarding the processing of Personal Data in a timely and proper manner, as well as all information and documents necessary for the processing of Personal Data. Instructions are provided in writing, including by email or by filling in our prepared forms.
You can learn more about how we process Personal Data when we act as a Data Processor in the DPA.
IF YOU ARE A RESIDENT OF THE UNITES STATES, WHAT DATA PROTECTIONS AND PRIVACY RIGHTS MAY BE/ ARE AFFORDED YOU?
These additional disclosures are made pursuant to the California Privacy Rights Act, Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act, Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act, and the Privacy and Security of Personal Information Chapter of the Nevada Revised Statutes Section 603A, as such laws may be in effect from time to time.
11.1. Additional Information for
California
Residents. (Effective January 1, 2023)
11.1.1. This Section supplements the description of our information collection and sharing practices elsewhere in this Privacy Policy to provide certain disclosures specific to California residents whose Personal Information we may collect, use, disclose and otherwise process pursuant to the then-current rules implementing the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act. When we say “Personal Information” in this Section 11.1., we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with you. Personal Information does not include information that is aggregated or information that cannot be reasonably linked to you.
11.1.2. The CCPA requires that we describe the Personal Information we collect using the categories as defined by the CCPA. While our collection, use and disclosure of Personal Information varies based on our relationship and interactions with you, this Section explains the categories of Personal information that we may generally collect about California consumers. In the preceding 12 months, we have collected the following categories of Personal Information as defined under the CCPA:
Identifiers such as a real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, and account name;
Characteristics of protected classifications under state or federal law, such as age or gender;
Commercial Information, including records of Services purchased and credit card or other payment information;
Internet or electronic network activity information, information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with the Services including an internet website, application, or advertisement;
Geolocation data; audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information such as profile pictures;
Professional or employment-related information;
Education information; and
Inferences drawn to create a profile about a consumer reflecting the consumer’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
11.1.3. As stated in 11.1.7. below, you may have the right to request certain information in regard to our collection, use or sharing of your Personal Information. While you may exercise such right through the methods provided forth herein, in being upmost transparent, we are providing you with following information ahead of time which may alleviate your need or desire to request additional information from us at a later time:
We collect Personal Information for business and commercial purposes described in Section 3.4 above.
We collect Personal Information directly from you, automatically from your use of our Services and from others as described in Sections 3.1, 3.2., 3.3.
We may share your Personal Information to third parties as described in Section 5 above. Specifically, as related to the CCPA, we “share” Personal Information to third parties for the purposes of providing personalized ads or content, also known as “cross-context behavioral advertising” or “internet-based advertising”. As such, we may “share” your Personal Information with a third party to help serve you with personalized content or ads that may be more relevant to your interests, and to otherwise advertise our Services.
We may collect the following sensitive Personal Information as defined under the CCPA: Contents of mail, email, or text messages. Note that we only collect, use, disclose or process sensitive Personal Information for the limited purposes permitted under the CCPA and not for the purposes of inferring any characteristics about a consumer.
11.1.4. In the twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of this Disclosure, we have not sold any Personal Information of yours.
11.1.5. We retain your information for as long as necessary to provide you with the Website and/or Services, as applicable. This means we keep your account information for as long as you maintain an account with us. We may retain transactional information for at least seven (7) years to ensure we can perform legitimate business functions, such as accounting for tax obligations. We also retain your information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our terms and policies.
11.1.6. Personal Information does not include information that is de-identified. When we receive or use deidentified information, we maintain it in de-identified form and do not attempt to reidentify the information.
11.1.7. California law provides some California residents with the rights listed below:
11.1.7.1. You may have the right to know and see what Personal Information we have collected about you, including:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected about you;
The categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or sharing your Personal Information;
The categories of third parties with whom we have disclosed your Personal Information; and
The specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you.
11.1.7.2. You may have the right to request that we delete the Personal Information we have collected from you (and direct our service providers to do the same).
11.1.7.3. You may have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information.
11.1.7.4. You may have the right to opt out of the sharing of your personal information to a third party for cross-context behavioral advertising.
11.1.7.5. You may have the right to exercise control over our collection and processing of certain sensitive Personal Information.
11.1.7.6. You may the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes.
11.1.7.7. You have the right not to receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising these rights.
However, please note that if the exercise of these rights limits our ability to process Personal Information (such as in the case of a deletion request), we may no longer be able to provide you our Services or engage with you in the same manner.
11.1.8. To request access to or deletion of your Personal Information, or to exercise any other privacy rights under California law, please contact us at
privacy@omnisend.com
, or on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
11.1.8.1. In order to protect your Personal Information from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional Personal Information for verification.
11.1.8.2. You may use an authorized agent to submit a rights request. If you do so, the authorized agent must present signed written authorization to act on your behalf, and you will also be required to independently verify your own identity directly with us and confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the rights request. This verification process is not necessary if your authorized agent provides documentation showing that the authorized agent has power of attorney to act on your behalf under Cal. Prob. Code §§ 4121 to 4130.
11.1.9. Since 2005, California Civil Code Section 1798.83, termed the California Shine the Light Law, permits you, if a California resident, to request certain information regarding any disclosure of Personal Information that we may make to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. Presently, we do not share our Personal Information with third parties for their own direct marketing purposes, and we will not do so without obtaining express consent. For inquiries regarding our disclosure policy, please use the contact details provided in Section 12 below.
11.1.10. California Business and Professions Code Section 22575(b) (as amended effective January 1, 2014) permits you, if a California resident, to be informed as to how we respond to Web browser “Do Not Track” settings. We do not currently take actions to respond to ‘Do Not Track’ settings. Instead we adhere to the standards set out in this Privacy Policy, as well as the specific requirements of applicable law. If you would like to find out more about Do Not Track you may find the following link useful:
http://www.allaboutdnt.com/
.
11.2. Addition Information for
Utah
Residents. (Effective December 1, 2023.)
For purposes of this Section 11.2., “Personal Data” means information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified individual or an identifiable individual. “Personal Data” does not include de-identified data, aggregated data, or publicly available information.
11.2.1. If you are a Utah resident, pursuant to the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, we must share with you that:
We collect Personal Data for the purposes described in Section 3.4 above;
We may share your Personal Data to third parties as described in Section 5 above; and
We collect the categories of Personal Data described in Section 3.2. above.
11.2.2. Utah law provides some Utah residents with the rights listed below:
11.2.2.1. You may have the right to know and see what Personal Data we have collected about you in a portable format.
11.2.2.2. You may have the right to request that we delete the Personal Data we have collected about you.
11.2.2.3. You may have the right to opt out of targeted advertising (as defined under Utah law).
11.2.3. To request access to or deletion of your Personal Data, or to exercise any other privacy rights under Utah law, please contact us at
privacy@omnisend.com
, or on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
11.3. Addition Information for
Connecticut
Residents. (Effective July 1, 2023.)
For purposes of this Section 11.3., “Personal Data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.
11.3.1. The Connecticut Data Privacy Act, if applicable to us, provides some Connecticut residents with the rights listed below:
You may have the right to know and see what Personal Data we have collected about you in a portable format.
You may have the right to request that we correct inaccurate Personal Data.
You may have the right to request that we delete the Personal Data we have collected about you.
You may have the right to opt out of targeted advertising (as defined under Connecticut law).
11.3.2. To request access to or deletion of your Personal Data, or to exercise any other privacy rights under Connecticut law, please contact us at
privacy@omnisend.com
, on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
11.4. Addition Information for
Virginia
Residents. (Effective January 1, 2023.)
For purposes of this Section 11.4., “Personal Data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.
11.4.1. If you are a Virginia resident, pursuant to the Virginia Consumer Privacy Act, we must share with you that:
We collect Personal Data for the purposes described in Section 3.4 above;
We may share your Personal Data to third parties as described in Section 5 above; and
We collect the categories of Personal Data described in Section 3.2. above.
11.4.2. Virginia law, if applicable to us, provides some Virginia residents with the rights listed below:
You may have the right to know and see what Personal Data we have collected about you.
You may have the right to request that we correct inaccurate Personal Data.
You may have the right to request that we delete the Personal Data we have collected about you.
You may have the right to opt out of targeted advertising (as defined under Virginia law).
11.4.3. To request access to or deletion of your Personal Data, or to exercise any other privacy rights under Virginia law, please contact us at
privacy@omnisend.com
, on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
11.5. Addition Information for
Colorado
Residents. (Effective July 1, 2023.)
For purposes of this Section 11.5., “Personal Data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.
11.5.1. Colorado law, if applicable, provides some Colorado residents with the rights listed below:
You may have the right to know and see what Personal Data we have collected about you in a portable format.
You may have the right to request that we correct inaccurate Personal Data.
You may have the right to request that we delete the Personal Data we have collected about you.
You may have the right to opt out of targeted advertising (as defined under Colorado law).
11.5.2. To request access to or deletion of your Personal Data, or to exercise any other privacy rights under Colorado law, please contact us at
privacy@omnisend.com
, on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
11.5.3. Please note that to respond to some rights we may need to verify your request either by asking you to log in and authenticate your account or otherwise verify your identity by providing information about yourself or your account. Authorized agents can make a request on your behalf if you have given them legal power of attorney or we are provided proof of signed permission, verification of your identity, and, in some cases, confirmation that you provided the agent permission to submit the request.
11.6. Addition Information for
Nevada
Residents. (Effective October 1, 2019.)
11.6.1. If you are a Nevada resident, under Privacy and Security of Personal Information Chapter of the Nevada Revised Statutes Section 603A (“603A”), we are required to provide you with the following:
We may collect certain covered information (as defined under Nevada Law) when you use or visit our Services, including, but not limited to first and last name, home or other physical address, electronic email address, and telephone number;
We may share your covered information to third parties as described in Section 5 above; and
Third parties may collect covered information about your online activities over time and across different internet websites or online services when you use our Services.
11.6.2. Nevada residents have a right to submit a verified request directing a website operator to not make any “sale” of covered information collected about a consumer for monetary consideration to a person for such person to license or sell the information to additional persons, subject to certain exceptions. We do not engage in the “sale” of covered information.
11.6.3. If you would like to review, correct, or update your covered information, you or your authorized representative may submit your request to
privacy@omnisend.com
, on our toll-free number at 1-800-905-0937, or via any other method which may be specified in Section 12 below.
CONTACT US
If you have any questions regarding the information provided in this Privacy Policy, please contact us by:
Email: privacy@omnisend.com; or
Our toll-free number: 1-800-905-0937
If you wish to submit a complaint regarding our processing of Personal Data, please provide it to us in writing, giving as much information as possible. We will cooperate with you and try to resolve all issues immediately.
If you believe that your rights have been violated in accordance with the GDPR, you can lodge a complaint with our supervisory authority – the State Data Protection Inspectorate of the Republic of Lithuania, you can find more information and contact details on the website of the inspectorate (
https://vdai.lrv.lt/
). We strive to resolve all disputes expeditiously and peacefully, so first of all we invite you to contact us.
All disputes and disagreements arising between us and our Customer while we act as Personal Data Processors or Sub-Processors shall be settled by negotiation between us. If no agreement is reached within 30 days from the date of receipt of the written notification of the disputed issue, disputes and disagreements shall be settled in the courts of the Republic of Lithuania, in accordance with the law of the Republic of Lithuania. In the event of disagreement between us and the Customer, the guilty party shall indemnify the other party for the direct losses it has suffered. Our liability in all cases shall be limited to the amount payable by the Customer for 1 month of the Services unless liability cannot be limited in accordance with the requirements of applicable law. Loss of Personal Data is considered an indirect loss.
FINAL PROVISIONS
We may change this Privacy Policy. We will notify you of the changes by placing an updated Privacy Policy on the Website, or by other common means of communication. Additions or changes to the Privacy Policy shall take effect from the date of renewal specified in the Privacy Policy unless another effective date is specified.
If you continue to use the Platform, Partners Portal, the Services, visit the Website, contact us, etc. it is deemed that you have accepted the amended terms of the Privacy Policy.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.paidonresults.com/privacy.html:
Home
Merchants
Affiliates
Agencies
Affiliate Network
Affiliate Programs
Contact Us
Paid On Results Limited
Centrum House
38 Queen Street
Glasgow G1 3DX
United Kingdom
www.paidonresults.com
General policy
Paid On Results respects your privacy. The information that you provide us with or that is gathered automatically helps us and third parties to monitor our service and provide you with the services that you have subscribed to. Please bear in mind that any personal information that you submit through forums, letters/emails for publication and the like may be collected by others. If you have any concerns, questions or comments please contact us.
Email newsletters
Paid On Results operates email newsletters on its site which are free to sign up to. What we ask of you is your email address although at times we may ask you for further information which is used for demographic purposes. We do not give our email lists out to other parties unless you choose to opt in to a scheme whereby third parties may use your details for their own purposes. Our newsletters may contain promotions or advertisements from various businesses, information on other sites or services that we offer. If at any time you wish to unsubscribe from our newsletter you may do so by visiting the site you signed up with and using the unsubscribe facility. You may also email the website editor although it may take a longer time before your email address is removed than with the automatic unsubscribe facility.
Registration
Our site may require you to register with us. This is to allow access to extra services that we provide for you. The information is not used for sending you newsletters or promotions unless stated.
Third party sites
Our site operates with third party sites (such as online shops), we may, on occasion, share non-personal aggregated information to these third parties.
Cookies
We use 'cookies' to track advertising information and website usage. On certain sites or third party sites we may utilise cookies for other purposes such as order tracking in online shops or for targeting advertisements to particular types of visitor.
Surveys
On occasion we may conduct online surveys. This is used to gauge our service, collect demographic information and other information that we may find useful. These surveys are optional. We may share non-personal, aggregated information with third parties.
Security
While we strive to keep the information that you supply directly or indirectly secure please be aware that the Internet is not a fully secure medium.
Usage of information
If requested we may submit your information to local or government authorities.
Corrections / Updates
You may unsubscribe from our newsletters using the facilities available on the website you signed up with or by emailing the relevant online editor. If you have any problems please contact us.
Policy changes
By using our site you agree to accept this privacy policy and are aware that our policy may change with time. Any changes to this policy will appear on this web page.
Registered under the Data Protection Act. Registration No. Z8456502
Find out more about Paid On Results...
AFFILIATE NETWORK
SOME OF THE AFFILIATES WE WORK WITH...
Sub-policy 7
https://www.klarna.com/international/privacy-policy/:
Discover Klarna
For Business
Privacy policy
Select your country of residence from the list below to read the appropriate policy.
Klarna
Australia
Austria
Belgium (
fr
/
nl
)
Canada (
en
/
fr
)
Czech Republic
Denmark
Finland (
fi
/
se
)
France
Germany
Greece
Hungary
Ireland
Italy
Mexico
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Slovakia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland (
de
/
fr
/
it
/
en
)
United Kingdom
United States (
en
/
es
)
Luxembourg
Bulgaria
Slovenia
PriceRunner
Denmark
Sweden
United Kingdom